


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Visitors Insurance, Travel Health Insurance USA - VisitorsInsurance.com



































 info@visitorsinsurance.com











  
 Any questions  please call
1.800.344.9540 (Toll Free - USA / Canada) 1.847.897.5120  ( Local )















Home(current)

Travel Visitor Products







Core Products

Visitors Insurance Plans
Pre-existing Condition Plans
Green card / Immigrant Plans
US Citizens Traveling Abroad
Long term int'l Insurance (H1/L1)
Int'l Group Travel Insurance





Specialty Products


Schengen Visa Travel Insurance
Student Insurance(F1/J1 & OPT)
US Student Study Abroad Plan
Trip cancellation/Interruption
Missionary Medical Insurance





Domestic Plans

Major Medical ACA Plans
Short Term Medical Plans
Dental & Vision Insurance
Term & Universal Life Insurance





Employee Benefits for IT Companies


Low Cost Group Insurance (H1/B1 Emp) 

Group Insurance for IT Companies 







Client Resources







Find a PPO Doctor/Hospital

IMG PPO Network
Tokiomarine HCC PPO network
Azimuth Risk PPO Network
Seven Corners PPO Network
Trawick International PPO Network
IMG Int’l Doctors/Hospitals list





Renewal Links

IMG Renewal
Tokiomarine HCC Plans Renewal
Seven Corners Renewal
Trawick International Renewal





Claim Forms


IMG Claim Form 
Tokiomarine HCC Plans Claim form

Medex plans Claim form 

Azimuth Risk Solution Claim Form 

Seven Corners Claim Form 

Trawick International Claim Form 





Other Links


Print IMG ID card 
IMG Embassy Visa Letter 
Trawick Int'l Partial Refund Form
Become a subagent 
FAQs







About Us
Contact Us







Atlas Travel® Insurance
                    Comprehensive plan without sub limits













Atlas Travel® Insurance 
Get Quote Apply Online








For international travel, Atlas Travel® Insurance provides customizable coverage for travelers looking to cover specific needs while abroad.
International travel can represent financial risk. The benefits of many standard medical insurance policies do not apply beyond the borders of your home country. An Atlas Travel® Insurance
                                        plan can be the difference between a trip ruined by unexpected illness or injury, versus a trip with access to quality care and financial help if the unexpected strikes.
HCC has developed two Atlas Travel® plans that offer a complete package of international benefits available 24 hours a day. Atlas America® provides coverage for non-U.S. citizens traveling outside their home country while Atlas International provides coverage for US citizens traveling outside their home country.
Important things you should know about Atlas Visitors Insurance
There are many different types of insurance policies that are around today, but one of the best ones you can try out is the Atlas America Visitor Insurance policy. The medical insurance policy is available to visitors in the United States, as well as all foreign tourists who are traveling to the United States for business or for leisure. There is massive demand for this travel insurance package, because it is available for new immigrants in the United States, as well as international students, and overseas travelers as well.



 
Read More











Important Links


 Brochure
 Application



Find a Doctor/Hospital
Claim Form
Renewal
Policy Wording
Cancellation & Refund policy
Excluded/Eligibility of States of Residence









Customer Support






Toll Free
 1-800-344-9540







Local
 1-847-897-5120




Please call us if you need more information about Visitors Insurance plans or Other plans which we offer










Benefits
Rates 
Exclusions
Claims
FAQS






BENEFIT
LIMIT


Deductibles
$0, $100, $250, $500, $1,000 or $2,500 per certificate period


Coinsurance – Claims incurred in U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 80% of the next $5,000 of 
                                            eligible expenses after the deductible, then 100% to the overall maximum 
                                            limit. Coinsurance will be waived if expenses are incurred within the PPO 
                                            and expenses are submitted to underwriters for review and payment 
                                            directly to the provider.
                                        


Coinsurance – Claims incurred outside U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 100% of eligible expenses after the 
                                            deductible up to the overall maximum limit


Hospital Room and Board
Average semi-private room rate, including nursing services


Local Ambulance
Usual, reasonable and customary charges, when covered illness or injury results in 
                                            hospitalization as inpatient


Intensive Care Unit
Usual, reasonable and customary charges


Emergency Room Copayment
In addition to coinsurance, the member shall be responsible for a $200 
                                            copayment for each use of emergency room for an illness unless the 
                                            member is admitted to the hospital. There will be no copayment for 
                                            emergency room treatment of an injury.


Urgent Care Center
For each visit, the member shall be responsible for a $50 copayment, after 
                                            which coinsurance will apply. Not subject to deductible.


Hospital Indemnity
$100  per  day  of  inpatient  hospitalization  (not  subject  to  deductible  or  coinsurance)


Physical Therapy
$50 maximum per day


All Other Eligible Medical Expenses
Usual, reasonable and customary charges


Acute Onset of Pre-existing Condition(excludes chronic and congenital conditions) (only available to members under age 70) 
 Overall maximum limit. $25,000 lifetime maximum for Emergency Medical Evacuation.


Emergency Dental (acute onset of pain)
$250 limit per certificate period (not subject to deductible or  
                                            coinsurance)


Emergency Medical Evacuation
$1,000,000 lifetime maximum, except as provided under acute onset of preexisting 
                                            condition (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)



                                            Return of Minor Children

                                            $50,000 per certificate period (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)
                                            Repatriation of Remains
                                            Overall maximum limit (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)


Pet  Return
Up to $1,000 to return a traveling pet home if member is hospitalized


Repatriation of Remains
Overall maximum limit (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)



                                            Emergency Reunion
                                        
                                            $50,000 limit per certificate period, subject to a maximum of 15 days  
                                            (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)


         
                                            Natural Disaster

                                            Maximum $100 a day for 5 days (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)



                                            Trip Interruption
                                        

                                            $5,000 limit per certificate period (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)



                                            Trip Delay
                                        

                                            $100 for a 12-hour delay requiring an unplanned overnight stay (2 days maximum).



                                            Lost Checked Luggage
                                        

                                            $500 limit per certificate period (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)
                                        



                                            Political Evacuation
                                        

                                            $10,000 lifetime maximum (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)
                                        



                                            Terrorism
                                        

                                            $50,000 maximum lifetime limit, eligible medical expenses only



                                            Accidental Death and Dismemberment 
                                            (excludes loss due to common carrier accident; $250,000 
                                            maximum benefit per any one family or group) 

                                            Not subject to deductible or coinsurance
                                        



                                            Members up to age 18
                                        

                                            Lifetime max. - $5,000; Death - $5,000; Loss of 2 limbs - $5,000; Loss of 1 limb - $2,500
                                        



                                            Members under age 18 through 69
                                        

                                            Lifetime max. - $50,000; Death - $50,000; Loss of 2 limbs - $50,000; Loss of 1 limb - $25,000
                                            Optional Accidental Death & Dismemberment buy-up of $50,000 to Lifetime max. $100,000
                                        



                                            Members under age 70 through 74
                                        

                                            Lifetime max. - $12,500; Death - $12,500; Loss of 2 limbs - $12,500; Loss of 1 limb - $6,250
                                        



                                            Members under age 75 and older
                                        

                                            Lifetime max. - $6,250; Death - $6,250; Loss of 2 limbs - $6,250; Loss of 1 limb - $3,125
                                        



                                            Common Carrier Accidental Death
                                            ($250,000 maximum benefit per any one family or group)
                                        

                                            Not subject to deductible or coinsurance
                                            Up to age 18 - $25,000 per member; Age 18 through 69 - $50,000 per member;
                                            Age 70 to 74 - $12,500 per member; Age 75 and older - $6,250
                                        



                                            Overall Maximum Limit Per Certificate Period
                                        

                                            Age 80 or older - $10,000; Age 70 to 79 - $50,000 or $100,000;
                                            All others - $50,000, $100,000, $200,000, $500,000 or $1,000,000

                                        



                                            Crisis Response
                                        

                                            $10,000 limit per certificate period;  Includes access to Unity Crisis Group services.
                                            Optional Crisis Response buy-up of $90,000 to Lifetime max. $100,000

                                        



                                            Personal Liability
                                        

                                            $10,000 lifetime maximum.
                                            Optional Personal Liability buy-up of $90,000 to Lifetime max. $100,000

                                        



                                            Bedside Visit
                                        

                                            $1,500 (economy ticket for family member to visit if member admitted to ICU).

                                        





Certain types of medical expenses are excluded from coverage under Atlas Travel® insurance. Some exclusions are listed here. Refer the Description of Coverage for the complete list of exclusions.

Pre-existing conditions — charges resulting directly or indirectly from any pre-existing condition, as herein defined, are excluded from this insurance unless it is a sudden and unexpected outbreak or recurrence that is of short duration and requires urgent care. Under Atlas Travel®, no coverage is available for known, scheduled, required, or expected medical care, drugs, or treatments existent or necessary prior to the effective date of coverage.
Routine medical examinations
Routine pre-natal care, pregnancy, child birth, and post-natal care
Medical expenses for injury or illness resulting from participation in extreme sports (see Description of Coverage for full list of excluded sports).



 



Does Atlas Travel® provide any coverage while I am in my home country?
Atlas Travel® does offer medical expense coverage in your home country in the following situations:

                                                Benefit Period –Atlas Travel® will cover eligible medical expenses in the member’s home country for 90 days after the beginning of treatment so long as the related illness or injury began while the certificate was still in effect and treatment began while the member was outside their home country.

                                                Incidental Home Country Coverage – For U.S. citizens, medical expenses are only covered during incidental trips home totaling no more than 15 days per three-month period of coverage. Incidental visit time must be used within the three-month period earned, and the member must continue his or her international trip in order to be eligible for this benefit. Medical expenses for non-U.S. citizens will be covered up to a maximum of 30 days for any three-month period. Medical expenses incurred in your home country will not be covered if your purpose for returning to your home country is to obtain treatment of an illness or injury that began while traveling. 
Will Atlas Travel® cover me on trips of a year or longer?
For non-U.S. citizens or residents whose travel does not include the U.S. or U.S. territories, the maximum coverage duration is 365 days. Additionally, coverage may be renewed up to 2 additional coverage periods. Coverage renewal requires satisfaction of a new deductible and coinsurance. Renewals may be filed through the Client Zone.
                                                For all other travelers, the maximum duration is 364 days, and coverage is not renewable. 
How do I cancel my Atlas Travel® coverage?
You may submit a written cancellation request to HCCMIS prior to the effective date of coverage for a full refund. If HCCMIS receives the cancellation request following the effective date of coverage, only the unused portion of premium will be refunded. A $25 cancellation fee will apply.
Will Atlas Travel® cover multiple trips? 
No. Atlas Travel® coverage is purchased for a duration you specify and applies to a single trip only. For coverage that applies to multiple trips, our Atlas MultiTrip™ product may work for you. 
Are there any countries not covered in my Atlas Travel® plan? 
Yes. Certain travel restrictions declared by the U.S. State Department, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), and certain OFAC sanctions, affect Atlas Travel® coverage.
Who is eligible for an Atlas Travel® insurance plan?
Anyone who is at least 14 days old and traveling internationally is eligible for coverage. . Policies must cover a minimum of five days; however, travel is not required for all five days. Applicants under age 70 may select an overall maximum limit ranging from $50,000 to $1,000,000. The overall maximum limit for members age 70 - 79 is $100,000, and the overall maximum limit for members over age 80 is $10,000 ($20,000 under Atlas Premium).
If I purchase an Atlas Travel® Insurance plan, when does coverage become effective, and when does it end?
Your Atlas Travel® insurance coverage becomes effective on the latest of:

the moment we receive your application and correct premium (if application and payment is made online or by fax)
12:01am on the date we receive your application and payment (if application and payment are made by mail)
the moment you depart from your home country
12:01am on the date you request on your application

Your coverage will end on the earliest of:

11:59pm on the last day of the period for which you have paid a premium,
11:59pm on the date requested on your application,
the moment of your arrival upon return to your home country (unless you have started a benefit period or are eligible for home country coverage)


Is Atlas Travel® extendable?
Following the initial purchase, Atlas Travel® coverage may be extended up to 364 days past the original effective date of coverage. Extension does not require satisfaction of a new deductible or coinsurance. File all extensions through the HCCMIS Client Zone with payment by credit card.
Will Atlas Travel® cover my dependents?
Yes.  You may purchase Atlas Travel® coverage for your spouse and any number of additional dependents. 
What is covered under the Atlas Travel® insurance plan?
To see an overview of the benefits provided under Atlas Travel® insurance coverage, please review our Atlas Travel® Insurance Coverage page. 
How do I extend or renew my Atlas Travel® insurance coverage?
After your initial purchase, you may extend your coverage (5 day minimum) up to a maximum of 364 days from the initial effective date. Provided there is no break in coverage, you will not be required to re-satisfy the Deductible and Coinsurance nor will benefit limits be reset. If you are covered under Atlas International, after 364 days of continuous coverage you may renew your coverage for up to two additional coverage periods. Deductible and Coinsurance must be re-satisfied as of each renewal date. If a new application is required, then you must re-satisfy your Deductible, Coinsurance and Pre-existing Condition provisions.
Extensions or renewals must be made online in the Client Zone with payment by credit card.

How do I extend my Atlas Travel® Insurance?

Follow the below instructions to EXTEND your Atlas Travel® medical insurance plan:

Go to the HCC Client Zone at: https://zone.hccmis.com/clientzone/
To login, you will need to enter your Certificate/ID number (ID #) and your password.  If you don’t know your password, click the “forgot password“? button and enter your Certificate ID (ID #) and your date of birth.  Click “Login.“?
Click "Extend Coverage".?
Enter the extension of coverage date. Click “Recalculate.“? Click “Proceed to Payment Page.“?
Enter payment information.  Click “Extend My Coverage.“?
The email you enter in the payment information will receive coverage confirmation. 











      






 
LIFE INSURANCE QUOTES 
                            IN 3 EASY STEPS



 BECOME OUR SUBAGENT 



IMG-POLICY RENEWAL LINK










     



 





















    Atlas America Insurance































800-605-2282 Sign In | 



—
















Atlas America® Insurance


ATLAS TRAVEL®
Customizable travel medical insurance for single trips.
LEARN MORE
or
Get a Quote

Finally taking that trip you’ve always dreamed of to the United States? Whether you’re planning to travel solo or with your family for work, school, or pleasure, you’re probably equal parts excited and stressed.
For international visitors unfamiliar with the U.S. healthcare system, questions of health and safety can be a major source of travel anxiety. Would you be able to seek treatment if you suffered an injury or unexpected illness while exploring the country? Would your medical expenses be covered by your home country health insurance policy?
If the answer to either of these questions is no, then it’s time to explore your travel medical insurance options.
What is Atlas America insurance?
Atlas America is a travel medical insurance policy for non-U.S. citizens and residents visiting the United States. Available to individuals, families, and groups, Atlas America insurance can cover individuals from most countries who are at least 14 days old and traveling to the U.S. from abroad.
Policies must cover a minimum of 5 days, though you do not have to travel all 5 days to be eligible for coverage. Coverage is available up to 364 days.

Why do I need insurance for my trip to the U.S.?
Your home country health insurance policy may not cover you across international lines – or it may provide very limited international coverage. And in the United States, people are responsible for their own healthcare costs, meaning you’ll be financially responsible for any medical expenses stemming from an unexpected illness or injury.
According to healthcare.gov, a broken leg can cost up to $7,500 to fix in the United States, and the average cost of a 3-day hospital stay is around $30,000.
Travel medical insurance, as noted by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), can reduce “the cost of a medical emergency" and the resulting “financial burden on travelers" by providing access to quality care and financial help if the unexpected occurs as you travel throughout the United States.
It can also serve as evidence that you’ll be able to pay for medical expenses incurred during your time in the U.S., which may be required if you need a visa to enter the country.


What benefits does Atlas America provide?
Atlas America insurance provides benefits for eligible medical expenses incurred in the U.S., including Hospital Room and Board, Local Ambulance, Emergency Medical Evacuation, Intensive Care Unit, and all other eligible costs.
It also provides supplemental travel benefits like Trip Interruption, Travel Delay, and Lost Checked Luggage.
Key features of Atlas America insurance include:

Up to $2,000,000 in maximum coverage per covered injury or illness and per certificate period
Your choice of deductible ranging from $0 to $2,500 per certificate period
Coinsurance at 80% of the next $5,000 of eligible expenses after the deductible, then 100% to the maximum coverage limit. Within the Preferred Provider Network (PPO), coinsurance is waived and eligible expenses are paid at 100% after the deductible, up to the overall maximum.
Provider network with over 5,000 hospitals and more than 90,000 healthcare facilities throughout the U.S.
Free travel assistance services available in multiple languages 365 days a year

Other Atlas America highlights:

Accidental Death & Dismemberment (AD&D)
Repatriation of Remains
Political Evacuation
Terrorism
Natural Disaster
Personal Liability

To see the full list of Atlas America insurance benefits and exclusions, see the Description of Coverage. 

Why choose Atlas America insurance?
Flexibility: Atlas America policies are affordable and flexible, allowing you to select the deductible, length of coverage, and coverage maximum that best align with your travel needs.
Plus, if you need to extend your coverage after you purchase your policy, you can extend (5-day minimum) up to a maximum of 364 days from your initial coverage start date. Provided there is no break in coverage, you will not be required to re-satisfy your deductible or coinsurance and your benefit limits will not reset.
Ease-of-Use: Purchasing Atlas America insurance is fast and easy – online fulfillment is available immediately and no health screenings are required for acceptance. Plus, our provider network covers all 50 states, with easy access for the majority of the U.S.
When you purchase an Atlas America insurance policy, you will also receive a fulfillment document with detailed instructions on how to use it. These instructions will explain how to seek medical treatment, how to file a claim, and how to contact the customer service department with any additional questions you may have.
Year-Round Assistance: As an Atlas America policyholder, you will receive access to our full line of travel assistance services, available in multiple languages 365 days a year. These services include:

Lost passport and travel documents assistance
Tracking for lost luggage
Assistance with emergency cash transfers
Embassy and consulate referrals
Legal and accounting referrals
Provider referrals

Does Atlas America meet visa requirements?
As a USA visitor, you may need a visa in order to gain entry to the United States. Whether or not you’ll need a visa is determined by your country of citizenship. The type of visa you'll need is dependent on the purpose of your travel.
Here are just a few common USA visitor visa types:

Visitor Visa: For people coming to the U.S. for a short period of time – typically 6 months or less – to visit children or relatives, tour, or vacation
Temporary Worker Visa: For individuals coming to the U.S. for a fixed period of time to receive job training or perform short-term or seasonal work
J-1 Visa: For USA visitors enrolling in work-and-study-based exchange programs in order to teach, study, conduct research, or receive on-site job training in the U.S.

In order to be approved for your visa, you’ll need to fulfill visa requirements. While your visa may not require you to have travel medical insurance, it may require you to show proof of funds to cover expenses incurred in the United States.
One way to evidence these funds is to purchase a travel medical policy like Atlas America, which provides policyholders with a visa letter to serve as proof of medical coverage.
Atlas America also meets the minimum insurance requirements of a J-1 visa as established by the U.S. Department of State.
Get a Quote











KHE2FFFYH6SP-152-894
Tokio Marine HCC - Medical Insurance Services Group (MIS Group) is a service company and a member of the Tokio Marine HCC group of companies. Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group has authority to enter into contracts of insurance on behalf of the Lloyd's underwriting members of Lloyd's Syndicate 4141, which is managed by Tokio Marine HCC – International Group.






























    Atlas Travel® Insurance































800-605-2282 Sign In | 



—
















Atlas Travel® Insurance
For international travel, Atlas Travel insurance provides customizable coverage for travelers looking to cover specific needs while abroad.
Perfect for:

Travelers wanting to build a custom plan
Coverage balance between the essentials and more specific needs

Need something different? Compare all Atlas Travel medical insurance plan levels.
Why do I need travel medical insurance?
International travel can represent financial risk. The benefits of many standard medical insurance policies do not apply beyond the borders of your home country. An Atlas Travel medical insurance plan can be the difference between a trip ruined by unexpected illness or injury, versus a trip with access to quality care and financial help if the unexpected strikes.














Quote
 
 


Benefits
Exclusions
Claim
FAQs
Glossary
Quote









Benefit1
Details


Deductibles
$0, $100, $250, $500, $1,000, or $2,500 per certificate period



Maximum Coverage per Injury or Illness
Age 70 to 79: $50,000 or $100,000
Age 80 or older: $10,000
All others: $50,000, $100,000, $200,000, $500,000, $1,000,000, or $2,000,000


Maximum Coverage per Certificate Period
(Excludes Emergency Medical Evacuation, Accidental Death & Dismemberment, Common Carrier Accidental Death, Personal Liability and Crisis Response)
Age 70 to 79: $50,000 or $100,000  Age 80 or older: $10,000  All others: $50,000, $100,000, $200,000, $500,000, $1,000,000, or $2,000,000


Coinsurance – Claims Incurred in U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 80% of next $5,000 of eligible expenses after the deductible, then 100% to maximum coverage limit


Coinsurance – Claims Incurred Outside U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 100% of eligible expenses after the deductible up to the maximum coverage limit


Hospital Room and Board
Average semi-private room rate, including nursing services


Local Ambulance
Usual, reasonable and customary charges, when covered illness or injury results in hospitalization as inpatient


Emergency Room Co-Payment – Claims Incurred in U.S. or Canada
$200 co-payment for each use of emergency room for illness, unless member is admitted to the hospital. No co-payment for emergency room treatment of an injury.


Intensive Care Unit
Usual, reasonable and customary charges


Physical Therapy and Chiropractic Care
$50 maximum per day. Must be ordered in advance by a physician.


Terrorism
$50,000 maximum lifetime limit, eligible medical expenses only


All Other Eligible Medical Expenses
Usual, reasonable and customary charges






Benefit2
Details



Emergency Medical Evacuation
$1,000,000 lifetime maximum


Repatriation of Remains
Overall maximum limit


Local Burial or Cremation
$5,000 lifetime maximum


Accidental Death and Dismemberment (AD&D)
Excludes loss due to common carrier accident $250,000 maximum benefit for any one family or group  Members under age 18: Lifetime maximum: $5,000 Death: $5,000 Loss of 2 limbs: $5,000 Loss of 1 limb: $2,500  Members age 18—69: Lifetime maximum: $50,000 Death: $50,000 Loss of 2 limbs: $50,000 Loss of 1 limb: $25,000 
Optional Accidental Death & Dismemberment buy-up of $50,000 to Lifetime Maximum of $100,000.
 Members age 70—74: Lifetime maximum: $12,500 Death: $12,500 Loss of 2 limbs: $12,500 Loss of 1 limb: $6,250  Members age 75 and older: Lifetime maximum: $6,250 Death: $6,250 Loss of 2 limbs: $6,250 Loss of 1 limb: $3,125


Common Carrier Accidental Death
Per member; subject to a maximum of $250,000 any one family or group:

Members under age 18: $25,000
Members age 18—69: $50,000
Members age 70—74: $12,500
Members age 75 and older: $6,250


Crisis Response—Ransom, Personal Belongings, and Crisis Response Fees and Expenses
$10,000 maximum per certificate period. Optional Crisis Response buy-up with Natural Disaster Evacuation Coverage: $90,000 per certificate period, with $10,000 maximum for Natural Disaster Evacuation.


Emergency Reunion
$50,000 per certificate period, subject to a maximum of 15 days


Bedside Visit
$1,500 per certificate period


Return of Minor Children
$50,000 per certificate period


Pet Return
$1,000 per certificate period


Political Evacuation
$10,000 lifetime maximum


Trip Interruption
$5,000 per certificate period


Lost Checked Luggage
$500 per certificate period


Travel Delay
Maximum $100/day after a 12-hour delay period requiring an unplanned overnight stay. Subject to a maximum of 2 days.


Emergency Dental (Acute Onset of Pain)
$250 per certificate period


Natural Disaster – Replacement Accommodations
Maximum $100/day for 5 days. Optional Personal Liability buy-up of $90,000 to Lifetime Maximum of $100,000. 


Hospital Indemnity
$100 per day of inpatient hospitalization


Personal Liability
$10,000 lifetime maximum



1Eligible expenses subject to deductible or coinsurance
2Eligible expenses NOT subject to deductible or coinsurance







Certain types of medical expenses are excluded from coverage under Atlas Travel insurance. Some exclusions are listed here. Refer to the Description of Coverage for the complete list of exclusions.

Pre-existing conditions — charges resulting directly or indirectly from any pre-existing condition are excluded from this insurance, except as covered under the Acute Onset of Pre-Existing Condition benefit for a sudden and unexpected outbreak or recurrence that is of short duration and requires urgent care, excluding chronic or congenital conditions. No coverage is available for known, scheduled, required, or expected medical care, drugs, or treatments existent or necessary prior to the effective date of coverage.
Routine medical examinations
Routine pre-natal care, pregnancy, child birth, and post-natal care
Medical expenses for injury or illness resulting from participation in specifically excluded extreme sports (see Description of Coverage for full list of excluded sports).﻿

Get a Quote
 
 


Get a Quote

 







                                                                    Does Atlas Travel provide any coverage while I am in my home country?
                                                                faq

 


Atlas Travel does offer medical expense coverage in your home country in the following situations:
Benefit Period
Atlas Travel will cover eligible medical expenses in the member’s home country for 90 days after the beginning of treatment so long as the related illness or injury began while the certificate was still in effect and treatment began while the member was outside their home country.
Incidental Home Country Coverage
For individuals with the U.S. as home country, for every three month period during which the Member is covered hereunder, medical expenses incurred in the U.S. are covered up to a maximum of 15 days.
For individuals with a home country other than the U.S., for every three month period during which the Member is covered hereunder, medical expenses incurred in the member’s home country are covered up to a maximum of 30 days. Any benefit accrued under a sin­gle 3 month period does not accumulate to another period. Failure of the member to continue his or her international trip or the members return to their home country for the sole purpose of obtaining treatment for an illness or injury that began while traveling shall void any home country coverage provided under the terms of this agreement.
 
 
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover me on trips of a year or longer?
                                                                faq

 


For non-U.S. citizens or residents whose travel does not include the U.S. or U.S. territories, the maximum coverage duration is 365 days. Additionally, coverage may be renewed up to 2 additional coverage periods. Coverage renewal requires satisfaction of a new deductible and coinsurance. Renewals may be filed through the Client Zone.
For all other travelers, the maximum duration is 364 days, and coverage is not renewable.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    How do I cancel my Atlas Travel coverage?
                                                                faq

 


You may submit a written cancellation request to Tokio Marine HCC – MIS Group prior to the effective date of coverage for a full refund. If Tokio Marine HCC – MIS Group receives the cancellation request following the effective date of coverage, only the unused portion of premium will be refunded. A $25 cancellation fee will apply. No refund will be issued for policies that have submitted claims.
 
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover multiple trips?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                No. Atlas Travel coverage is purchased for a duration you specify and applies to a single trip only. For coverage that applies to multiple trips, our Atlas MultiTrip™ product may work for you.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Are there any countries not covered in my Atlas Travel plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Yes. Certain countries under U.S. Government sanctions are not eligible for coverage. Additionally, certain travel restrictions declared by the U.S. State Department and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) effect benefits such as terrorism coverage, political evacuation, and coverage for communicable disease outbreaks. See Description of Coverage for restrictions and exclusions.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Who is eligible for an Atlas Travel insurance plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Anyone who is at least 14 days old and traveling internationally is eligible for coverage. . Policies must cover a minimum of five days; however, travel is not required for all five days. Applicants under age 70 may select an overall maximum limit ranging from $50,000 to $2,000,000. The overall maximum limit for members age 70 - 79 is $100,000, and the overall maximum limit for members over age 80 is $10,000 ($20,000 under Atlas Premium).
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    If I purchase an Atlas Travel Insurance plan, when does coverage become effective, and when does it end?
                                                                faq

 


Your Atlas Travel insurance coverage becomes effective on the latest of:

the moment we receive your application and correct premium (if application and payment is made online or by fax)
12:01am Eastern Time on the date we receive your application and payment (if application and payment are made by mail)
the moment you depart from your home country
12:01am Eastern Time on the date you request on your application

Your coverage will end on the earliest of:

11:59pm Eastern Time on the last day of the period for which you have paid a premium,
11:59pm Eastern Time on the date requested on your application,
the moment of your arrival upon return to your home country (unless you have started a benefit period or are eligible for home country coverage)

 
 
 




                                                                    Is Atlas Travel extendable?  
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Following the initial purchase, Atlas Travel coverage may be extended up to 364 days past the original effective date of coverage. Extension does not require satisfaction of a new deductible or coinsurance. File all extensions through the Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group Client Zone with payment by credit card.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover my dependents?  
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Yes.  You may purchase Atlas Travel coverage for your spouse and any number of additional dependents.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    What is covered under the Atlas Travel insurance plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                To see an overview of the benefits provided under Atlas Travel insurance coverage, please review our Atlas Travel Insurance Coverage page.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    How do I extend or renew my Atlas Travel insurance coverage?
                                                                faq

 


After your initial purchase, you may extend your coverage (5 day minimum) up to a maximum of 364 days from the initial effective date. Provided there is no break in coverage, you will not be required to re-satisfy the Deductible and Coinsurance nor will benefit limits be reset. If you are covered under Atlas International, after 364 days of continuous coverage you may renew your coverage for up to two additional coverage periods. Deductible and Coinsurance must be re-satisfied as of each renewal date. If a new application is required, then you must re-satisfy your Deductible, Coinsurance and Pre-existing Condition provisions.
Extensions or renewals must be made online in the Client Zone with payment by credit card.
 
 
 




                                                                    How do I extend my Atlas Travel insurance?
                                                                faq

 


Follow the below instructions to EXTEND your Atlas Travel medical insurance plan:

Go to the HCC Client Zone at: https://zone.hccmis.com/clientzone/
To login, you will need to enter your Certificate/ID number (ID #) and your password.  If you don’t know your password, click the “forgot password” button and enter your Certificate ID (ID #) and your date of birth.  Click “Login.”
Click “Extend Coverage.”
Enter the extension of coverage date. Click “Recalculate.” Click “Proceed to Payment Page.”
Enter payment information.  Click “Extend My Coverage.”
The email you enter in the payment information will receive coverage confirmation. 

 
 
 
 
 
 





A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z




ATop

Acts of Terrorism
                                                                                                                                    — an act, including but not limited to, the use of force or violence and/or the threat thereof, of any person or group(s) of persons, whether acting alone or on behalf of or in connection with any organization(s) or government(s) committed for political, religious, ideological or similar purposes including the intention to influence any government and/or to put the public, or any section of the public, in fear.
                                                                                                                            
Acute Onset of Pain (Emergency Dental)
                                                                                                                                    — a sudden and unexpected occurrence of pain which occurs spontaneously and without advance warning, either in the form of physician or dentist recommendation or symptoms, including pain, which would have caused a prudent person to seek medical or dental attention prior to onset of pain. Treatment must be obtained within 24 hours of the sudden and unexpected occurrence of pain.
                                                                                                                            

BTop

No terms found

CTop

No terms found

DTop

Displaced
                                                                                                                                    — required to depart a destination due to an evacuation ordered by prevailing authorities.
                                                                                                                            

ETop

Emergency Medical Evacuation
                                                                                                                                    — if recommended by your attending physician, who certifies that: evacuation is necessary to safeguard your life or limb, medically necessary treatment is not available locally, and if approved in advance and coordinated by Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group. If all circumstances are met, and the illness or injury is covered, certain plans will provide the following benefits: emergency air and/or ground transportation to the nearest hospital that is qualified to provide the medically necessary treatment.
                                                                                                                            
Emergency Reunion
                                                                                                                                    — an emergency reunion is the transportation of one relative (parent, spouse, sibling, or child aged 18 or older) to the hospital where a member is receiving inpatient care in the event of a covered emergency medical evacuation.
                                                                                                                            
Express Kidnapping
                                                                                                                                    — the actual or attempted abduction and holding of the member against his or her will, where personal belongings and/or readily available assets of the member are surrendered by the member in exchange for his or her release.
                                                                                                                            

FTop

No terms found

GTop

Guaranteed Issue
                                                                                                                                    — a type of insurance policy that is not medically underwritten.
                                                                                                                            

HTop

Home Country
                                                                                                                                    — Your Home Country is the country where you principally reside and receive regular mail. If you are a U.S. Citizen or resident, you are not eligible for coverage within the U.S except as provided under an eligible benefit period, regardless of the location of your principal residence.
                                                                                                                            

ITop

Insured Losses
                                                                                                                                    — covered losses and expenses consisting of the following: ransom, personal belongings, and/or crisis response fees and expenses.
                                                                                                                            

JTop

No terms found

KTop

Kidnapping
                                                                                                                                    — the actual, alleged, or attempted abduction and holding of the member against his or her will by a person or persons who demand a ransom specifically form the assets of the member in exchange for the member’s release.
                                                                                                                            

LTop

Lost Checked Luggage
                                                                                                                                    — lost checked luggage is a benefit that provides money for the replacement of clothes and personal hygiene items in the event your checked luggage is permanently lost by the transportation provider.
                                                                                                                            
Lost Luggage Assistance
                                                                                                                                    — tracking service to assist in locating luggage or other items lost in transit.
                                                                                                                            

MTop

No terms found

NTop

Natural Disaster
                                                                                                                                    — any event of force of nature caused by environmental factors that has catastrophic consequences. For the purpose of this insurance, natural disasters include: wildfire, earthquake, windborne dust or sand, volcanic eruption, tsunami, snow, rain or wind, that results in widespread and severe damage.
                                                                                                                            

OTop

No terms found

PTop

Personal Belongings
                                                                                                                                    — monies and/or property of monetary value that are: 

being carried or transported by the member when an express kidnapping or kidnapping first occurs; and
are surrendered during the course of an express kidnapping or kidnapping


Political Evacuation
                                                                                                                                    — political evacuation is a benefit offered under certain plans that assists in the coordination and associated costs of transportation to a safe country after a U.S. Government travel warning has been issued after arrival to the destination country.
                                                                                                                            
Pre-Destination Information
                                                                                                                                    — up-to-date information regarding the required vaccinations, health risks, travel restrictions, and weather conditions specific to your destination country.
                                                                                                                            

QTop

No terms found

RTop

Return of Minor Children
                                                                                                                                    — return of minor children is the assistance and financial coverage of transporting covered minor children to the terminal serving the area of principal residence when the only person age 18 or older traveling with them has been hospitalized for treatment of a covered Illness or Injury resulting in the children being left unattended for a period of time expected to exceed 36 hours.
                                                                                                                            
Repatriation of Remains
                                                                                                                                    — this is a benefit that covers expenses to return an insured’s remains (bodily or ashes) to their home country in the event of his or her death resulting from a covered Injury or Illness.
                                                                                                                            
Ransom
                                                                                                                                    — monies and/or other consideration of monetary value that are surrendered or to be surrendered by, or on behalf of, the member to meet an express kidnapping or kidnapping demand.
                                                                                                                            

STop

No terms found

TTop

Travel Document Replacement
                                                                                                                                    — assistance with obtaining replacement passports, birth certificates, visas, airline documents, and other travel-related documents.
                                                                                                                            
Travel Assistance Services
                                                                                                                                    — travel assistance services are complimentary services that focus on potential travel issues, which are available to every member that purchases an international insurance product from Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group. See the travel assistance services list for more details.
                                                                                                                            

UTop

No terms found

VTop

No terms found

WTop

No terms found

XTop

No terms found

YTop

No terms found

ZTop

No terms found








Quote
 
 


 
 
 


KHE2FFFYH6SP-152-789
Tokio Marine HCC - Medical Insurance Services Group (MIS Group) is a service company and a member of the Tokio Marine HCC group of companies. Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group has authority to enter into contracts of insurance on behalf of the Lloyd's underwriting members of Lloyd's Syndicate 4141, which is managed by Tokio Marine HCC – International Group.


















Quote Estimator




















YOUR PRODUCER


                                        Tokio Marine HCC - Medical Insurance Services Group
                                    

317-221-8089


sales@hccmis.com






Quote Estimator




 






Coverage Area




Worldwide, including U.S.
Worldwide, excluding U.S.







Travel Dates





Coverage Start Date





















Coverage End Date




















Travelers' Birthdates
























 Add Traveler
                                            






Eligibility Requirements



                                                Get Quote Now
                                            




 





Atlas Travel® InsuranceFor international travel, Atlas insurance provides customizable coverage for travelers looking to cover specific needs while abroad.Perfect For:Travelers wanting to build a custom planCoverage balance between the essentials and more specific needsWhy do I need travel medical insurance?International travel can represent financial risk. The benefits of many standard medical insurance policies do not apply beyond the borders of your home country. An Atlas medical insurance plan can be the difference between a trip ruined by unexpected illness or injury, versus a trip with access to quality care and financial help if the unexpected strikes. 











Please wait while we process your request.









































    Atlas Premium Insurance | HCC Medical Insurance Services































800-605-2282 Sign In | 



—
















Atlas Premium Insurance
For the travel elite, Atlas Premium travel insurance provides exceptional, quality coverage as you travel abroad.
Perfect For:

Parents interested in premium family coverage for their children and themselves
Tourists, adventure travelers, and vacationers interested in emergency medical benefits and supplemental travel-assistance benefits in the highest possible coverage amounts
The business and travel elite seeking additional peace of mind


Why do I need travel medical insurance?
International travel can represent financial risk. The benefits of many standard medical insurance policies do not apply beyond the borders of your home country. A travel medical insurance plan can be the difference between a trip ruined by unexpected illness or injury, versus a trip with access to quality care and financial help if the unexpected strikes. Compare Atlas Travel medical insurance plans.














Quote
 
 


Benefits
Exclusions
Claim
FAQs
Glossary
Quote









Benefits1
Details


Deductibles
$0, $100, $250, $500, $1,000 or $2,500 per certificate period


Maximum Coverage per Injury or Illness
Age 70 to 79: $50,000 or $100,000

Age 80 or older: $20,000
All others: $50,000, $100,000, $200,000, $500,000, $1,000,000, or $2,000,000


Maximum Coverage per Certificate Period
(Excludes Emergency Medical Evacuation, Accidental Death & Dismemberment, Common Carrier Accidental Death, Personal Liability and Crisis Response)
Age 70 to 79: $50,000 or $100,000

Age 80 or older: $20,000

All others: $50,000, $100,000, $200,000, $500,000, $1,000,000, or $2,000,000


Coinsurance – Claims Incurred in U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 90% of next $5,000 of eligible expenses after the deductible, then 100% to maximum coverage limit. Coinsurance will be waived if expenses are incurred within the Preferred Provider Organization (PPO).


Coinsurance – Claims Incurred Outside U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 100% of eligible expenses after the deductible up to the maximum coverage limit


Hospital Room and Board
Average semi-private room rate, including nursing services


Local Ambulance
Usual, reasonable, and customary charges when covered illness or injury results in hospitalization as inpatient


Emergency Room Co-Payment—Claims incurred in U.S. or Canada
Member is responsible for $200 co-payment for each use of the emergency room for an illness, unless admitted to the hospital. No co-payment for emergency room treatment of an injury.


Intensive Care Unit
Usual, reasonable, and customary charges


Physical Therapy and Chiropractic Care
$50 maximum per day. Must be ordered in advance by a physician.


Urgent Care Center—Claims incurred in U.S. or Canada
(Not subject to deductible)
Member responsible for $50 co-payment/visit, after which coinsurance will apply.


Terrorism
$50,000 maximum lifetime limit, eligible medical expenses only


All Other Eligible Medical Expenses
Usual, reasonable, and customary charges






Benefits2
Details



Accidental Death and Dismemberment (AD&D)
Excludes loss due to common carrier accident $100,000 maximum benefit for any one family or group  Members under age 18: Lifetime maximum: $5,000 Death: $5,000 Loss of 2 limbs: $5,000 Loss of 1 limb: $2,500  Members age 18—69: Lifetime maximum: $100,000 Death: $100,000 Loss of 2 limbs: $100,000 Loss of 1 limb: $50,000
Members age 70—74: Lifetime maximum: $12,500 Death: $12,500 Loss of 2 limbs: $12,500 Loss of 1 limb: $6,250  Members age 75 and older: Lifetime maximum: $6,250 Death: $6,250 Loss of 2 limbs: $6,250 Loss of 1 limb: $3,125


Emergency Medical Evacuation
$1,000,000 lifetime maximum


Repatriation of Remains
Overall maximum limit


Local Burial or Cremation
$5,000 lifetime maximum


Common Carrier Accidental Death
(Per member; subject to a maximum of $250,000 any one family or group)

Members under age 18: $25,000
Members age 18—69: $50,000
Members age 70—74: $12,500
Members age 75 and older: $6,250


Emergency Reunion
$50,000 per certificate period, subject to a maximum of 15 days


Crisis Response—Ransom, Personal Belongings, and Crisis Response Fees and Expenses
$100,000 maximum per certificate period


Bedside Visit
$1,500 per certificate period


Return of Minor Children
$50,000 per certificate period


Pet Return
$1,000 per certificate period


Political Evacuation
$25,000 lifetime maximum


Trip Interruption
$10,000 per certificate period


Lost Checked Luggage
$1,000 per certificate period


Travel Delay
Maximum $200/day after a 12-hour delay period requiring an unplanned overnight stay. Subject to a maximum of 2 days.


Emergency Dental (acute onset of pain)
$250 per certificate period


Natural Disaster – Replacement Accommodations
Maximum $250/day for 5 days


Hospital Indemnity
$100 per day of inpatient hospitalization


Personal Liability
$100,000 lifetime maximum



1Eligible expenses subject to deductible or coinsurance
2Eligible expenses NOT subject to deductible or coinsurance







Certain types of medical expenses are excluded from coverage under Atlas Travel insurance. Some exclusions are listed here. Refer to the Description of Coverage for the complete list of exclusions.

Pre-existing conditions — charges resulting directly or indirectly from any pre-existing condition are excluded from this insurance, except as covered under the Acute Onset of Pre-Existing Condition benefit for a sudden and unexpected outbreak or recurrence that is of short duration and requires urgent care, excluding chronic or congenital conditions. No coverage is available for known, scheduled, required, or expected medical care, drugs, or treatments existent or necessary prior to the effective date of coverage.
Routine medical examinations
Routine pre-natal care, pregnancy, child birth, and post-natal care
Medical expenses for injury or illness resulting from participation in specifically-excluded extreme sports (see Description of Coverage for full list of excluded sports).﻿

 
 




 







                                                                    Does Atlas Travel provide any coverage while I am in my home country?
                                                                faq

 


Atlas Travel does offer medical expense coverage in your home country in the following situations:
Benefit Period
Atlas Travel will cover eligible medical expenses in the member’s home country for 90 days after the beginning of treatment so long as the related illness or injury began while the certificate was still in effect and treatment began while the member was outside their home country.
Incidental Home Country Coverage
For individuals with the U.S. as home country, for every three month period during which the Member is covered hereunder, medical expenses incurred in the U.S. are covered up to a maximum of 15 days.
For individuals with a home country other than the U.S., for every three month period during which the Member is covered hereunder, medical expenses incurred in the member’s home country are covered up to a maximum of 30 days. Any benefit accrued under a sin­gle 3 month period does not accumulate to another period. Failure of the member to continue his or her international trip or the members return to their home country for the sole purpose of obtaining treatment for an illness or injury that began while traveling shall void any home country coverage provided under the terms of this agreement.
 
 
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover me on trips of a year or longer?
                                                                faq

 


For non-U.S. citizens or residents whose travel does not include the U.S. or U.S. territories, the maximum coverage duration is 365 days. Additionally, coverage may be renewed up to 2 additional coverage periods. Coverage renewal requires satisfaction of a new deductible and coinsurance. Renewals may be filed through the Client Zone.
For all other travelers, the maximum duration is 364 days, and coverage is not renewable.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    How do I cancel my Atlas Travel coverage?
                                                                faq

 


You may submit a written cancellation request to Tokio Marine HCC – MIS Group prior to the effective date of coverage for a full refund. If Tokio Marine HCC – MIS Group receives the cancellation request following the effective date of coverage, only the unused portion of premium will be refunded. A $25 cancellation fee will apply. No refund will be issued for policies that have submitted claims.
 
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover multiple trips?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                No. Atlas Travel coverage is purchased for a duration you specify and applies to a single trip only. For coverage that applies to multiple trips, our Atlas MultiTrip™ product may work for you.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Are there any countries not covered in my Atlas Travel plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Yes. Certain countries under U.S. Government sanctions are not eligible for coverage. Additionally, certain travel restrictions declared by the U.S. State Department and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) effect benefits such as terrorism coverage, political evacuation, and coverage for communicable disease outbreaks. See Description of Coverage for restrictions and exclusions.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Who is eligible for an Atlas Travel insurance plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Anyone who is at least 14 days old and traveling internationally is eligible for coverage. . Policies must cover a minimum of five days; however, travel is not required for all five days. Applicants under age 70 may select an overall maximum limit ranging from $50,000 to $2,000,000. The overall maximum limit for members age 70 - 79 is $100,000, and the overall maximum limit for members over age 80 is $10,000 ($20,000 under Atlas Premium).
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    If I purchase an Atlas Travel Insurance plan, when does coverage become effective, and when does it end?
                                                                faq

 


Your Atlas Travel insurance coverage becomes effective on the latest of:

the moment we receive your application and correct premium (if application and payment is made online or by fax)
12:01am Eastern Time on the date we receive your application and payment (if application and payment are made by mail)
the moment you depart from your home country
12:01am Eastern Time on the date you request on your application

Your coverage will end on the earliest of:

11:59pm Eastern Time on the last day of the period for which you have paid a premium,
11:59pm Eastern Time on the date requested on your application,
the moment of your arrival upon return to your home country (unless you have started a benefit period or are eligible for home country coverage)

 
 
 




                                                                    Is Atlas Travel extendable?  
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Following the initial purchase, Atlas Travel coverage may be extended up to 364 days past the original effective date of coverage. Extension does not require satisfaction of a new deductible or coinsurance. File all extensions through the Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group Client Zone with payment by credit card.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover my dependents?  
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Yes.  You may purchase Atlas Travel coverage for your spouse and any number of additional dependents.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    What is covered under the Atlas Travel insurance plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                To see an overview of the benefits provided under Atlas Travel insurance coverage, please review our Atlas Travel Insurance Coverage page.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    How do I extend or renew my Atlas Travel insurance coverage?
                                                                faq

 


After your initial purchase, you may extend your coverage (5 day minimum) up to a maximum of 364 days from the initial effective date. Provided there is no break in coverage, you will not be required to re-satisfy the Deductible and Coinsurance nor will benefit limits be reset. If you are covered under Atlas International, after 364 days of continuous coverage you may renew your coverage for up to two additional coverage periods. Deductible and Coinsurance must be re-satisfied as of each renewal date. If a new application is required, then you must re-satisfy your Deductible, Coinsurance and Pre-existing Condition provisions.
Extensions or renewals must be made online in the Client Zone with payment by credit card.
 
 
 




                                                                    How do I extend my Atlas Travel insurance?
                                                                faq

 


Follow the below instructions to EXTEND your Atlas Travel medical insurance plan:

Go to the HCC Client Zone at: https://zone.hccmis.com/clientzone/
To login, you will need to enter your Certificate/ID number (ID #) and your password.  If you don’t know your password, click the “forgot password” button and enter your Certificate ID (ID #) and your date of birth.  Click “Login.”
Click “Extend Coverage.”
Enter the extension of coverage date. Click “Recalculate.” Click “Proceed to Payment Page.”
Enter payment information.  Click “Extend My Coverage.”
The email you enter in the payment information will receive coverage confirmation. 

 
 
 
 
 
 





A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z




ATop

Acts of Terrorism
                                                                                                                                    — an act, including but not limited to, the use of force or violence and/or the threat thereof, of any person or group(s) of persons, whether acting alone or on behalf of or in connection with any organization(s) or government(s) committed for political, religious, ideological or similar purposes including the intention to influence any government and/or to put the public, or any section of the public, in fear.
                                                                                                                            
Acute Onset of Pain (Emergency Dental)
                                                                                                                                    — a sudden and unexpected occurrence of pain which occurs spontaneously and without advance warning, either in the form of physician or dentist recommendation or symptoms, including pain, which would have caused a prudent person to seek medical or dental attention prior to onset of pain. Treatment must be obtained within 24 hours of the sudden and unexpected occurrence of pain.
                                                                                                                            

BTop

No terms found

CTop

No terms found

DTop

Displaced
                                                                                                                                    — required to depart a destination due to an evacuation ordered by prevailing authorities.
                                                                                                                            

ETop

Emergency Medical Evacuation
                                                                                                                                    — if recommended by your attending physician, who certifies that: evacuation is necessary to safeguard your life or limb, medically necessary treatment is not available locally, and if approved in advance and coordinated by Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group. If all circumstances are met, and the illness or injury is covered, certain plans will provide the following benefits: emergency air and/or ground transportation to the nearest hospital that is qualified to provide the medically necessary treatment.
                                                                                                                            
Emergency Reunion
                                                                                                                                    — an emergency reunion is the transportation of one relative (parent, spouse, sibling, or child aged 18 or older) to the hospital where a member is receiving inpatient care in the event of a covered emergency medical evacuation.
                                                                                                                            
Express Kidnapping
                                                                                                                                    — the actual or attempted abduction and holding of the member against his or her will, where personal belongings and/or readily available assets of the member are surrendered by the member in exchange for his or her release.
                                                                                                                            

FTop

No terms found

GTop

Guaranteed Issue
                                                                                                                                    — a type of insurance policy that is not medically underwritten.
                                                                                                                            

HTop

Home Country
                                                                                                                                    — Your Home Country is the country where you principally reside and receive regular mail. If you are a U.S. Citizen or resident, you are not eligible for coverage within the U.S except as provided under an eligible benefit period, regardless of the location of your principal residence.
                                                                                                                            

ITop

Insured Losses
                                                                                                                                    — covered losses and expenses consisting of the following: ransom, personal belongings, and/or crisis response fees and expenses.
                                                                                                                            

JTop

No terms found

KTop

Kidnapping
                                                                                                                                    — the actual, alleged, or attempted abduction and holding of the member against his or her will by a person or persons who demand a ransom specifically form the assets of the member in exchange for the member’s release.
                                                                                                                            

LTop

Lost Checked Luggage
                                                                                                                                    — lost checked luggage is a benefit that provides money for the replacement of clothes and personal hygiene items in the event your checked luggage is permanently lost by the transportation provider.
                                                                                                                            
Lost Luggage Assistance
                                                                                                                                    — tracking service to assist in locating luggage or other items lost in transit.
                                                                                                                            

MTop

No terms found

NTop

Natural Disaster
                                                                                                                                    — any event of force of nature caused by environmental factors that has catastrophic consequences. For the purpose of this insurance, natural disasters include: wildfire, earthquake, windborne dust or sand, volcanic eruption, tsunami, snow, rain or wind, that results in widespread and severe damage.
                                                                                                                            

OTop

No terms found

PTop

Personal Belongings
                                                                                                                                    — monies and/or property of monetary value that are: 

being carried or transported by the member when an express kidnapping or kidnapping first occurs; and
are surrendered during the course of an express kidnapping or kidnapping


Political Evacuation
                                                                                                                                    — political evacuation is a benefit offered under certain plans that assists in the coordination and associated costs of transportation to a safe country after a U.S. Government travel warning has been issued after arrival to the destination country.
                                                                                                                            
Pre-Destination Information
                                                                                                                                    — up-to-date information regarding the required vaccinations, health risks, travel restrictions, and weather conditions specific to your destination country.
                                                                                                                            

QTop

No terms found

RTop

Return of Minor Children
                                                                                                                                    — return of minor children is the assistance and financial coverage of transporting covered minor children to the terminal serving the area of principal residence when the only person age 18 or older traveling with them has been hospitalized for treatment of a covered Illness or Injury resulting in the children being left unattended for a period of time expected to exceed 36 hours.
                                                                                                                            
Repatriation of Remains
                                                                                                                                    — this is a benefit that covers expenses to return an insured’s remains (bodily or ashes) to their home country in the event of his or her death resulting from a covered Injury or Illness.
                                                                                                                            
Ransom
                                                                                                                                    — monies and/or other consideration of monetary value that are surrendered or to be surrendered by, or on behalf of, the member to meet an express kidnapping or kidnapping demand.
                                                                                                                            

STop

No terms found

TTop

Travel Document Replacement
                                                                                                                                    — assistance with obtaining replacement passports, birth certificates, visas, airline documents, and other travel-related documents.
                                                                                                                            
Travel Assistance Services
                                                                                                                                    — travel assistance services are complimentary services that focus on potential travel issues, which are available to every member that purchases an international insurance product from Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group. See the travel assistance services list for more details.
                                                                                                                            

UTop

No terms found

VTop

No terms found

WTop

No terms found

XTop

No terms found

YTop

No terms found

ZTop

No terms found








Quote
 
 


 
 
 


KHE2FFFYH6SP-152-791
Tokio Marine HCC - Medical Insurance Services Group (MIS Group) is a service company and a member of the Tokio Marine HCC group of companies. Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group has authority to enter into contracts of insurance on behalf of the Lloyd's underwriting members of Lloyd's Syndicate 4141, which is managed by Tokio Marine HCC – International Group.















10-K: ATLAS AMERICA SERIES 26-2005 L.P. - MarketWatch




























































Latest News










Dow

21,613
+100.26
+0.47%






Nasdaq

6,412
+1.37
+0.02%






S&P 500

2,477
+7.22
+0.29%









7:06 A.M. ET


                                  Six Flags says rainy weather hurt attendance in Q2
                                





 
7:06 A.M. ET


                                  Hershey Q2 revenue $1.7 mln vs. $1.6 mln; FactSet consensus $1.7 mln
                                





 
7:06 A.M. ET


                                  Six Flags Q2 FactSet EPS consensus 70 cents; revenue $438 mln
                                





 
7:05 A.M. ET


                                  Six Flags Q2 revenue $422 million, up 4%
                                





 
7:05 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor Q2 automotive revenue $37.11 bln vs. $36.93 bln
                                





 
7:05 A.M. ET


                                  Six Flags Q2 EPS 59 cents, down 8%
                                





 
7:04 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor Q2 F-Series sales up 7%
                                





 
7:04 A.M. ET


                                  Hershey Q2 adj. EPS $1.09; FactSet consensus 90 cents
                                





 
7:04 A.M. ET


                                  Hershey Q2 EPS 95 cents vs. 68 cents
                                





 
7:04 A.M. ET


                                  Whole Foods earnings: Sales expected to fall
                                





 
7:03 A.M. ET


                                  P&G earnings: What to expect
                                





 
7:03 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor sees 2017 adj. EPS $1.65-$1.85; FactSet consensus $1.51
                                





 
7:03 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor Q2 revenue $39.85 bln vs. $39.49 bln a year ago; FactSet consensus $37.28 bln
                                





 
7:02 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor Q2 adj. EPS 56 cents; FactSet consensus 43 cents
                                





 
7:02 A.M. ET


                                  Ford shares up 1.6% premarket
                                





 
7:02 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor Q2 EPS 51 cents vs. 49 cents a year ago
                                





 
7:01 A.M. ET


                                  Shares of AT&T are up 2.6% in premarket
                                





 
7:00 A.M. ET


                                  What Trump's vow to repeal Dodd-Frank means for banks
                                





 
7:00 A.M. ET


                                  Coca-Cola's stock jumps 1.4% premarket after Q2 results
                                





 
7:00 A.M. ET


                                  Coca-Cola previous 2017 adj. EPS outlook was down 1% to down 3%
                                





 








































Log In















 


Until New York Markets Open

Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings














Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-K: ATLAS AMERICA SERIES 26-2005 L.P.
    








    By

Published: Mar 31, 2014 10:45 a.m. ET

Share


















































 



 






















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- ITEM 7: MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS  The discussion and analysis presented below provides information to assist in understanding our financial condition and results of operations. This discussion should be read in conjunction with ("item 8:Financial Statements and Supplementary Data"), which contains our financial statements.  The following discussion may contain forward-looking statements that reflect our plans, estimates and beliefs. Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date the statements were made. The matters discussed in these forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those made, projected or implied in the forward-looking statements. We believe the assumptions underlying the financial statements are reasonable. However, our financial statements included herein may not necessarily reflect our results of operations, financial position and cash flows in the future.  BUSINESS OVERVIEW  Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. ("we", "us", or "the Partnership") is a Delaware limited partnership and formed on May 26, 2005 with Atlas Resources, LLC serving as its managing general partner and operator ("Atlas Resources" or "MGP"). Atlas Resources is an indirect subsidiary of Atlas Resources Partners, L.P. ("ARP") 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    ARP, -1.08%
 We have drilled and currently operate wells located in Pennsylvania and Tennessee. We have no employees and rely on our MGP for management, which in turn, relies on its ultimate parent company, Atlas Energy ("Atlas Energy") 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    ATLS, +17.19%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         for administrative services.  The following discussion provides information to assist in understanding our financial condition and results of operations. Our operating cash flows are generated from our wells, which primarily produce natural gas, but also some oil. Our produced natural gas and oil is then delivered to market through affiliated or third-party gas gathering systems. Our ongoing operating and maintenance costs have been and are expected to be fulfilled through revenues from the sale of our natural gas and oil production. We pay our MGP, as operator, a monthly well supervision fee, which covers all normal and regularly recurring operating expenses for the production and sale of natural gas and oil such as:  - Well tending, routine maintenance and adjustment;  - Reading meters, recording production, pumping, maintaining appropriate books and records; and  - Preparation of reports for us and government agencies.  The well supervision fees, however, do not include costs and expenses related to the purchase of certain equipment, materials, and brine disposal. If these expenses are incurred, we pay cost for third-party services, materials, and a competitive charge for service performed directly by our MGP or its affiliates. Also, beginning one year after each of our wells has been placed into production, our MGP, as operator, may retain $200 per month per well to cover the estimated future plugging and abandonment costs of the well. As of December 31, 2013, our MGP had not withheld any funds for this purpose. The MGP is currently evaluating its right to exercise this option based on several factors such as commodity prices, the natural decline in well production, and current future plugging services and costs.  MARKETS AND COMPETITION  The availability of a ready market for natural gas and oil produced by us, and the price obtained, depends on numerous factors beyond our control, including the extent of domestic production, imports of foreign natural gas and oil, political instability or terrorist acts in oil and gas producing countries and regions, market demand, competition from other energy sources, the effect of federal regulation on the sale of natural gas and oil in interstate commerce, other governmental regulation of the production and transportation of natural gas and oil and the proximity, availability and capacity of pipelines and other required facilities. Our MGP is responsible for selling our production. During 2013 and 2012, we experienced no problems in selling our natural gas and oil. Product availability and price are the principal means of competing in selling natural gas and oil production. While it is impossible to accurately determine our comparative position in the industry, we do not consider our operations to be a significant factor in the industry.  Natural Gas. We market the majority of our natural gas production to gas marketers directly or to third party plant operators who process and market our gas. The sales price of natural gas produced is a function of the market in the area and typically tied to a regional index. The pricing indices for the Appalachian Basin are Dominion South Point, Tennessee Gas Pipeline and Transco Leidy Line.  We do not hold firm transportation obligations on any pipeline that requires payment of transportation fees regardless of natural gas production volumes. As is customary in certain of our other operating areas, we occasionally commit a predictable portion of monthly production to the purchaser in order to maintain a gathering agreement.  Crude Oil. Crude oil produced from our wells flows directly into leasehold storage tanks where it is picked up by an oil company or a common carrier acting for an oil company. The crude oil is typically sold at the prevailing spot market price for each region, less appropriate trucking charges. We do not have delivery commitments for fixed and determinable quantities of crude oil in any future periods under existing contracts or agreements.  For the year ended December 31, 2013, Chevron Natural Gas and Atmos Energy Marketing, LLC accounted for approximately 56% and 12% of our total natural gas and oil production revenues, respectively, with no other single customer accounting for more than 10% for this period.  GENERAL TRENDS AND OUTLOOK  We expect our business to be affected by the following key trends. Our expectations are based on assumptions made by us and information currently available to us. To the extent our underlying assumptions about or interpretations of available information prove to be incorrect, our actual results may vary materially from our expected results.  The areas in which we operate are experiencing a significant increase in natural gas and oil production related to new and increased drilling for deeper natural gas formations and the implementation of new exploration and production techniques, including horizontal and multiple fracturing techniques. The increase in the supply of natural gas has put a downward pressure on domestic natural gas prices. While we anticipate continued high levels of exploration and production activities over the long-term in the areas in which we operate, fluctuations in energy prices can greatly affect production rates and investments by third parties in the development of new natural gas and oil reserves.  Our future production, cash flow, and our ability to make distributions to our unitholders, including the MGP, depend on our success in producing our current reserves efficiently. We face the challenge of natural production declines and volatile natural gas and oil prices. As initial reservoir pressures are depleted, natural gas production from particular wells decreases.  RESULTS OF OPERATIONS  GAS AND OIL PRODUCTION: The following table sets forth information related to our production revenues, volumes, sales prices, production costs and depletion during the periods indicated:   Years Ended December 31, 2013 2012 Production revenues (in thousands): Gas $ 1,067 $ 826 Oil 170 201 Total $ 1,237 $ 1,027 Production volumes: Gas (mcf/day) 752 759 Oil (bbls/day) 5 6 Total (mcfe/day) 782 795 Average sales price: (1) Gas (per mcf) (2) $ 4.18 $ 3.50 Oil (per bbl) $ 94.40 $ 89.85 Production costs: As a percent of revenues 57 % 71 % Per mcfe $ 2.47 $ 2.51 Depletion per mcfe $ 1.62 $ 1.45  (1) Average sales prices represent accrual basis pricing after reversing the effect of previously recognized gains resulting from prior period impairment charges.  (2) Average gas prices are calculated by including in total revenue derivative gains previously recognized into income in connection with prior period impairment charges and dividing by the total volume for the period. Previously recognized derivative gains were $79,800 and $147,300 for the years ended December 31, 2013 and 2012, respectively.  Natural Gas Revenues. Our natural gas revenues were $1,066,800 and $826,300 for the years ended December 31, 2013 and 2012, respectively, an increase of $240,500 (29%). The $240,500 increase in natural gas revenues for the year ended December 31, 2013 as compared to the prior year was attributable to a $250,100 increase in natural gas prices after the effect of financial hedges, which were driven by market conditions, partially offset by a $9,600 decrease in production volumes. Our production volumes decreased in to 752 mcf per day for the year ended December 31, 2013 from 759 mcf per day for the year ended December 31, 2012, a decrease of 7 (1%) mcf per day. The price we received for our natural gas is primarily a result of the index driven agreements (See Item 1 "Business-Contractual Revenue Arrangements"). Thus, the price we receive for our natural gas may vary significantly each month as the underlying index changes in response to market conditions. The decrease in production volume is mostly due to the normal decline inherent in the life of the wells.  Oil Revenues. We drill wells primarily to produce natural gas, rather than oil, but some wells have limited oil production. Our oil revenues were $170,400 and $200,800 for the years ended December 31, 2013 and 2012, respectively, a decrease of $30,400 (15%). The $30,400 decrease in oil revenues for the year ended December 31, 2013 as compared to the prior year was attributable to a $38,600 decrease in production volumes, partially offset by an $8,200 increase in oil prices after the effect of financial hedges. Our production volumes decreased to 5 bbls per day for the year ended December 31, 2013 from 6 bbls per day for the year ended December 31, 2012, a decrease of 1 bbl per day (17%).  Costs and Expenses. Production expenses were $705,400 and $730,000 for the years ended December 31, 2013 and 2012, respectively, a decrease of $24,600 (3%). This decrease was primarily due to a combination of a decrease in water disposal charges and lower supervision fees. The lower disposal costs were due to decreases in negotiated rates along with a decrease in the amount of water produced.  Depletion of our oil and gas properties as a percentage of oil and gas revenues was 37% and 41% for the years ended December 31, 2013 and 2012, respectively. These percentage changes were directly attributable to changes in revenues, oil and gas reserve quantities, product prices, production volumes and changes in the cost basis of oil and gas properties.  General and administrative expenses were $145,100 and $150,200 for the years ended December 31, 2013 and 2012, respectively, a decrease of $5,100 (3%). These expenses include third-party costs for services as well as the monthly administrative fees charged by our MGP and vary from period to period due to the costs and services provided to us.  There were no impairments of oil and gas properties for the years ended December 31, 2013 and 2012. Annually, we compare the carrying value of our proved developed oil and gas producing properties to their estimated fair market value. To the extent our carrying value exceeds the estimated fair market value, an impairment charge is recognized. As a result of this assessment, we did not recognize an impairment charge for the years ended December 31, 2013 and 2012. This charge is based on reserve quantities, future market prices and our carrying value. We cannot provide any assurance that similar charges may or may not be taken in future periods.  Liquidity and Capital Resources. Cash provided by operating activities increased $114,700 for the year ended December 31, 2013 to $449,600 as compared to $334,900 the year ended December 31, 2012. This increase was due to an increase in net earnings before depletion, non-cash loss on derivative value, asset impairment, and accretion of $173,500, payables to limited partners of $88,700, and an increase in the change in accrued liabilities of $13,400, partially offset by a $132,800 decrease in the change in accounts receivable trade-affiliate and a $28,100 decrease in asset retirement obligations settled, for the year ended December 31, 2013 compared to the year ended December 31, 2012.  Cash provided by investing activities was $10,400 during the year ended December 31, 2013 resulting from the sale of tangible equipment.  Cash used in financing activities increased $77,400 to $450,100 for the year ended December 31, 2013, from $372,700 for the year ended December 31, 2012. This increase was due to an increase in cash distributions to partners.  Our MGP may withhold funds for future plugging and abandonment costs. The MGP is currently evaluating its right to exercise this option based on several factors such as commodity prices, the natural decline in well production, and current future plugging services and costs. Through December 31, 2013, our MGP had not withheld any funds for this purpose. Any additional funds, if required, will be obtained from production revenues or borrowings from our MGP or its affiliates, which are not contractually committed to make loans to us. The amount that we may borrow may not at any time exceed 5% of our total subscriptions, and we will not borrow from third-parties.  We are generally limited to the amount of funds generated by the cash flow from our operations, which we believe is adequate to fund future operation and distributions to our partners. Historically, there has been no need to borrow funds from our MGP to fund operations.  ENVIRONMENTAL REGULATION  Our operations are subject to federal, state and local laws and regulations governing the release of regulated materials into the environment or otherwise relating to environmental protection or human health or safety (see "Item 1:  Environmental laws and regulations have changed substantially and rapidly over the last 25 years, and we anticipate that there will be continuing changes. Trends in environmental regulation include increased reporting obligations and placing more restrictions and limitations on activities, such as emissions of greenhouse gases and other pollutants, generation and disposal of wastes, including wastes that may have naturally occurring radioactivity, and use, storage and handling of chemical substances that may impact human health, the environment and/or endangered species. Other increasingly stringent environmental restrictions and limitations have resulted in increased operating costs for us and other similar businesses throughout the United States. It is possible that the costs of compliance with environmental laws and regulations may continue to increase. We will attempt to anticipate future regulatory requirements that might be imposed and to plan accordingly, but there can be no assurance that we will identify and properly anticipate each such change, or that our efforts will prevent material costs, if any, from rising.  CHANGES IN PRICES AND INFLATION  Our revenues and the value of our assets have been and will continue to be affected by changes in natural gas and oil market prices. Natural gas and oil prices are subject to significant fluctuations that are beyond our ability to control or predict.  Inflation affects the operating expenses of our operations. Inflationary trends may occur if commodity prices were to increase, since such an increase may cause the demand for energy equipment and services to increase, thereby increasing the costs of acquiring or obtaining such equipment and services. While we anticipate that inflation will affect our future operating costs, we cannot predict the timing or amounts of any such effects.  CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES  The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires making estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of actual revenue and expenses during the reporting period. Although we base our estimates on historical experience and various other assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the circumstances, actual results may differ from the estimates on which our financial statements are prepared at any given point of time. Changes in these estimates could materially affect our financial position, results of operations or cash flows. Significant items that are subject to such estimates and assumptions include revenue and expense accruals, depletion and amortization, asset impairment, fair value of derivative instruments, and the probability of forecasted transactions. We summarize our significant accounting policies within our financial statements included in ("item 8:Financial Statements") included in this report. The critical accounting policies and estimates we have identified are discussed below.  Depletion and Impairment of Long-Lived Assets  Long-Lived Assets. The cost of natural gas and oil properties, less estimated salvage value, is generally depleted on the units-of-production method.  Natural gas and oil properties are reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the assets may not be recoverable. A long-lived asset is considered to be impaired when the undiscounted net cash flows expected to be generated by the asset are less than its carrying amount. The undiscounted net cash flows expected to be generated by the asset are based upon our estimates that rely on various assumptions, including natural gas and oil prices, production and operating expenses. Any significant variance in these assumptions could materially affect the estimated net cash flows expected to be generated by the asset. As discussed in General Trends and Outlook within this section, recent increases in natural gas drilling have driven an increase in the supply of natural gas and put a downward pressure on domestic prices. Further declines in natural gas prices may result in additional impairment charges in future periods.  There were no impairments of proved oil and gas properties recorded by us for the years ended December 31, 2013 and 2012.  Events or changes in circumstances that would indicate the need for impairment testing include, among other factors: operating losses; unused capacity; market value declines; technological developments resulting in obsolescence; changes in demand for products manufactured by others utilizing our services or for our products; changes in competition and competitive practices; uncertainties associated with the United States and world economies; changes in the expected level of environmental capital, operating or remediation expenditures; and changes in governmental regulations or actions.  Fair Value of Financial Instruments  We have established a hierarchy to measure our financial instruments at fair value which requires us to maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs when measuring fair value. The hierarchy defines three levels of inputs that may be used to measure fair value:  Level 1 - Unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical, unrestricted assets and liabilities that the reporting entity has the ability to access at the measurement date.  Level 2 - Inputs other than quoted prices included within Level 1 that are observable for the asset and liability or can be corroborated with observable market data for substantially the entire contractual term of the asset or liability.  Level 3 - Unobservable inputs that reflect the entity's own assumptions about the assumptions market participants would use in the pricing of the asset or liability and are consequently not based on market activity but rather through particular valuation techniques.  We use a fair value methodology to value the assets and liabilities for our outstanding derivative contracts. Our commodity hedges are calculated based on observable market data related to the change in price of the underlying commodity and are therefore defined as Level 2 fair value measurements.  Liabilities that are required to be measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis include our asset retirement obligations ("ARO") that are defined as Level  Reserve Estimates  Our estimates of proved natural gas and oil reserves and future net revenues from them are based upon reserve analyses that rely upon various assumptions, including those required by the SEC, as to natural gas and oil prices, drilling and operating expenses, capital expenditures and availability of funds. The accuracy of these reserve estimates is a function of many factors including the following: the quality and quantity of available data, the interpretation of that data, the accuracy of various mandated economic assumptions, and the judgments of the individuals preparing the estimates. We engaged Wright and Company, Inc., an independent third-party reserve engineer, to prepare a report of our proved reserves (see "item 2:Properties").  Any significant variance in the assumptions utilized in the calculation of our reserve estimates could materially affect the estimated quantity of our reserves. As a result, our estimates of proved natural gas and oil reserves are inherently imprecise. Actual future production, natural gas and oil prices, revenues, development expenditures, operating expenses and quantities of recoverable natural gas and oil reserves may vary substantially from our estimates or estimates contained in the reserve reports and may affect our ability to pay distributions. In addition, our proved reserves may be subject to downward or upward revision based upon production history, prevailing natural gas and oil prices, mechanical difficulties, governmental regulation and other factors, many of which are beyond our control. Our reserves and their relation to estimated future net cash flows impact the calculation of impairment and depletion of oil and gas properties. Generally, an increase or decrease in reserves without a corresponding change in capitalized costs will have a corresponding inverse impact to depletion expense.  Asset Retirement Obligations  We recognize and estimate the liability for the plugging and abandonment of our gas and oil wells. The associated asset retirement costs are capitalized as part of the carrying amount of the long lived asset.  The estimated liability is based on our historical experience in plugging and abandoning wells, estimated remaining lives of those wells based on reserve estimates, external estimates as to the cost to plug and abandon the wells in the future and federal and state regulatory requirements. The liability is discounted using our MGP's assumed credit-adjusted risk-free interest rate. Revisions to the liability could occur due to changes in estimates of plugging and abandonment costs or remaining lives of the wells, or if federal or state regulators enact new plugging and abandonment requirements. We have no assets legally restricted for purposes of settling asset retirement obligations. Except for our gas and oil properties, we believe that there are no other material retirement obligations associated with tangible long lived assets.  Working Interest  Our Partnership Agreement establishes that revenues and expenses will be allocated to our MGP and limited partners based on their ratio of capital contributions to total contributions ("working interest"). Our MGP is also provided an additional working interest of 7% as provided in the Partnership Agreement. Due to the time necessary to complete drilling operations and accumulate all drilling costs, estimated working interest percentage ownership rates are utilized to allocate revenues and expense until the wells are completely drilled and turned on-line into production. Once the wells are completed, the final working interest ownership of the partners is determined and any previously allocated revenues based on the estimated working interest percentage ownership are adjusted to conform to the final working interest percentage ownership.  Mar 31, 2014  (c) 1995-2014 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


Here’s why oil just scored its biggest one-day rally of 2017


Bitcoin, digital currencies retreat from records


What everyone can learn from Jared Kushner’s unorthodox approach to meetings

















Quote References


ARP

-0.10
-1.08%



ATLS

+0.02
+17.19%





Most Popular





Here’s why oil just scored its biggest one-day rally of 2017





AMD earnings give investors what they wanted — now it must deliver on servers





Don’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs





The highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart





Valerian: Luc Besson's $180 Million Indie Film




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found




























Arctic Paper S.A.
Sweden: Stockholm: ARP




kr9.15

-0.10
(-1.08%)








Volume56
Openkr9.15
Highkr9.15
Lowkr9.15
P/E Ratio5.2
Div Yield0
Market Cap634.5M













Atlas Energy Group LLC
U.S.: OTC: ATLS




$0.13

+0.02
(+17.19%)








Volume390.6K
Open$0.12
High$0.13
Low$0.11
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market Cap3.5M
























 






















MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Open in:



Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



Credit


Currency


Markets


Supermarkets


Textiles


Gas Prices




Airlines


Oil


Currencies


U.S. Stocks


Retail


Federal Reserve




U.S. Dollar


United Kingdom


Europe


European Markets


Energy Stocks


Copper






People in the news



Trump, Donald


Buffett, Warren


Hill, David


Rather, Dan


Brin, Sergey


King, David




Lewis, Michael


Perry, Rick


Berlusconi, Silvio


McCain, John


Musk, Elon


Carter, Jimmy




Obama, Barack


Clinton, Bill


Jackson, Michael


Bloomberg, Michael


Putin, Vladimir


Snow, John






Companies in the news



Miners


Connor


American International Group


Lilly (Eli) & Co.


Dow Chemical


DuPont




Apple Inc.


American Manufacturing


Ford Motor


General Motors


Jones


3M Co




Bank of America Corp.


Caterpillar Inc.


Dow Jones & Co.


Google Inc.


McDonald's Corp.


News Corp.






Organizations in the news



European Union


Consumers Union


General Assembly


Small Business Administration


European Central Bank


Nasdaq Stock Market




World Bank


World Trade Organization


Bank of England


Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Investment Company Institute


New York Stock Exchange




College Board


New York University


State University of New York


University of Massachusetts


University of Washington


Washington State University












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




7:07 AM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Pre


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
7:07aSix Flags says rainy weather hurt attendance in Q2
7:06aHershey Q2 revenue $1.7 mln vs. $1.6 mln; FactSet consensus $1.7 mln
7:06aSix Flags Q2 FactSet EPS consensus 70 cents; revenue $438 mln
7:06aSix Flags Q2 revenue $422 million, up 4%
7:06aFord Motor Q2 automotive revenue $37.11 bln vs. $36.93 bln
7:05aSix Flags Q2 EPS 59 cents, down 8%
7:05aFord Motor Q2 F-Series sales up 7%
7:05aHershey Q2 adj. EPS $1.09; FactSet consensus 90 cents
7:04aHershey Q2 EPS 95 cents vs. 68 cents
7:04aWhole Foods earnings: Sales expected to fall
7:04aP&G earnings: What to expect
7:04aFord Motor sees 2017 adj. EPS $1.65-$1.85; FactSet consensus $1.51
7:03aFord Motor Q2 revenue $39.85 bln vs. $39.49 bln a year ago; FactSet consensus $37.28 bln
7:03aFord Motor Q2 adj. EPS 56 cents; FactSet consensus 43 cents
7:02aFord shares up 1.6% premarket
7:02aFord Motor Q2 EPS 51 cents vs. 49 cents a year ago
7:02aShares of AT&T are up 2.6% in premarket
7:01aCoca-Cola's stock jumps 1.4% premarket after Q2 results
7:01aWhat Trump's vow to repeal Dodd-Frank means for banks
7:00aCoca-Cola previous 2017 adj. EPS outlook was down 1% to down 3%
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,613.43

+100.26
+0.47%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,412.17

+1.37
+0.02%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.13

+7.22
+0.29%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































10-Q: ATLAS AMERICA SERIES 26-2005 L.P. - MarketWatch




























































Latest News










Dow

21,613
+100.26
+0.47%






Nasdaq

6,412
+1.37
+0.02%






S&P 500

2,477
+7.22
+0.29%









7:06 A.M. ET


                                  Six Flags says rainy weather hurt attendance in Q2
                                





 
7:06 A.M. ET


                                  Hershey Q2 revenue $1.7 mln vs. $1.6 mln; FactSet consensus $1.7 mln
                                





 
7:06 A.M. ET


                                  Six Flags Q2 FactSet EPS consensus 70 cents; revenue $438 mln
                                





 
7:05 A.M. ET


                                  Six Flags Q2 revenue $422 million, up 4%
                                





 
7:05 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor Q2 automotive revenue $37.11 bln vs. $36.93 bln
                                





 
7:05 A.M. ET


                                  Six Flags Q2 EPS 59 cents, down 8%
                                





 
7:04 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor Q2 F-Series sales up 7%
                                





 
7:04 A.M. ET


                                  Hershey Q2 adj. EPS $1.09; FactSet consensus 90 cents
                                





 
7:04 A.M. ET


                                  Hershey Q2 EPS 95 cents vs. 68 cents
                                





 
7:04 A.M. ET


                                  Whole Foods earnings: Sales expected to fall
                                





 
7:03 A.M. ET


                                  P&G earnings: What to expect
                                





 
7:03 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor sees 2017 adj. EPS $1.65-$1.85; FactSet consensus $1.51
                                





 
7:03 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor Q2 revenue $39.85 bln vs. $39.49 bln a year ago; FactSet consensus $37.28 bln
                                





 
7:02 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor Q2 adj. EPS 56 cents; FactSet consensus 43 cents
                                





 
7:02 A.M. ET


                                  Ford shares up 1.6% premarket
                                





 
7:02 A.M. ET


                                  Ford Motor Q2 EPS 51 cents vs. 49 cents a year ago
                                





 
7:01 A.M. ET


                                  Shares of AT&T are up 2.6% in premarket
                                





 
7:00 A.M. ET


                                  What Trump's vow to repeal Dodd-Frank means for banks
                                





 
7:00 A.M. ET


                                  Coca-Cola's stock jumps 1.4% premarket after Q2 results
                                





 
7:00 A.M. ET


                                  Coca-Cola previous 2017 adj. EPS outlook was down 1% to down 3%
                                





 








































Log In















 


Until New York Markets Open

Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings














Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-Q: ATLAS AMERICA SERIES 26-2005 L.P.
    








    By

Published: Aug 14, 2014 1:00 p.m. ET

Share


















































 



 






















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- ITEM 2. MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS (UNAUDITED)  Forward-Looking Statements  When used in this Form 10-Q, the words "believes", "anticipates," "expects" and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties could cause actual results to differ materially from the results stated or implied in this document. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date hereof. We undertake no obligation to publicly release the results of any revisions to forward-looking statements which we may make to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this Form 10-Q or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.  General  Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. ("we", "us", or the "Partnership") is a Delaware limited partnership, formed on May 26, 2005 with Atlas Resources, LLC serving as its Managing General Partner and Operator ("Atlas Resources" or "MGP"). Atlas Resources is an indirect subsidiary of Atlas Resource Partners, L.P. ("ARP") 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    ARP, -1.08%
 We have drilled and currently operate wells located in Pennsylvania and Tennessee. We have no employees and rely on our MGP for management, which in turn, relies on its parent company, Atlas Energy L.P. ("Atlas Energy"), for administrative services.  We do not plan to sell any of our wells and intend to produce them until they are depleted or become uneconomical to produce, at which time they will be plugged and abandoned or sold. We expect that no other wells will be drilled and no additional funds will be required for drilling.  Overview  The following discussion provides information to assist in understanding our financial condition and results of operations. Our operating cash flows are generated from our wells, which produce primarily natural gas, but also some oil. Our produced natural gas and oil is then delivered to market through affiliated or third-party gas gathering systems. Our ongoing operating and maintenance costs have been and are expected to be fulfilled through revenues from the sale of our natural gas and oil production. We pay our MGP, as operator, a monthly well supervision fee, which covers all normal and regularly recurring operating expenses for the production and sale of natural gas and oil such as:  · well tending, routine maintenance and adjustment;  · reading meters, recording production, pumping, maintaining appropriate books and records; and  · preparation of reports for us and government agencies.  The well supervision fees, however, do not include costs and expenses related to the purchase of certain equipment, materials, and brine disposal. If these expenses are incurred, we pay cost for third-party services, materials, and a competitive charge for services performed directly by our MGP or its affiliates. Also, beginning one year after each of our wells has been placed into production, our MGP, as operator, may retain $200 per month, per well to cover the estimated future plugging and abandonment costs of the well. As of June 30, 2014, our MGP withheld $9,800 of net production revenue for this purpose.  Markets and Competition  The availability of a ready market for natural gas and oil produced by us, and the price obtained, depends on numerous factors beyond our control, including the extent of domestic production, imports of foreign natural gas and oil, political instability or terrorist acts in oil and gas producing countries and regions, market demand, competition from other energy sources, the effect of federal regulation on the sale of natural gas and oil in interstate commerce, other governmental regulation of the production and transportation of natural gas and oil and the proximity, availability and capacity of pipelines and other required facilities. Our MGP is responsible for selling our production. During 2014 and 2013, we experienced no problems in selling our natural gas and oil. Product availability and price are the principal means of competition in selling natural gas and oil production. While it is impossible to accurately determine our comparative position in the industry, we do not consider our operations to be a significant factor in the industry.  Results of Operations The following table sets forth information relating to our production revenues, volumes, sales prices, production costs and depletion during the periods indicated: Three Months Ended Six Months Ended June 30, June 30, 2014 2013 2014 2013 Production revenues (in thousands): Gas $ 285 $ 303 $ 570 $ 544 Oil 91 43 110 81 Total $ 376 $ 346 $ 680 $ 625 Production volumes: Gas (mcf/day) (1) 675 775 643 758 Oil (bbl/day) (1) 10 5 6 5 Total (mcfe/day) (1) 735 805 679 788 Average sales prices: (2) Gas (per mcf) (1) (3) $ 4.72 $ 4.66 $ 4.97 $ 4.29 Oil (per bbl) (1) $ 96.01 $ 105.55 $ 94.28 $ 91.69 Production costs: As a percent of revenues 50 % 51 % 51 % 56 % Per mcfe (1) $ 2.80 $ 2.44 $ 2.82 $ 2.47 Depletion per mcfe $ 0.79 $ 1.90 $ 0.78 $ 1.89  (1) "Mcf" represents thousand cubic feet, "mcfe" represents thousand cubic feet equivalent, and "bbl" represents barrels. Bbl is converted to mcfe using the ratio of six mcfs to one bbl.  (2) Average sales prices represent accrual basis pricing after adjusting for the effect of previously recognized gains resulting from prior period impairment charges.  (3) Average gas prices are calculated by including in total revenue derivative gains previously recognized into income in connection with prior period impairment charges and dividing by the total volume for the period. Previously recognized derivative gains were $4,400 and $22,400 for the three months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively. Previously recognized derivative gains were $8,300 and $45,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively.  Natural Gas Revenues. Our natural gas revenues were $285,500 and $303,000 for the three months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively, a decrease of $17,500 (6%). The $17,500 decrease in natural gas revenues for the three months ended June 30, 2014 as compared to the prior year similar period was attributable to a $36,300 decrease in production volumes, partially offset by an $18,800 increase in our natural gas sales prices after the effect of financial hedges, which was driven by market conditions. Our production volumes decreased to 675 mcf per day for the three months ended June 30, 2014 from 775 mcf per day for the three months ended June 30, 2013, a decrease of 100 mcf per day (13%). The overall decrease in natural gas production is primarily due to the normal decline inherent in the life of a well.  Our natural gas revenues were $570,000 and $543,600 for the six months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively, an increase of $26,400 (5%). The $26,400 increase in natural gas revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2014 as compared to the prior year similar period was attributable to a $109,100 increase in our natural gas sales prices after the effect of financial hedges, which was driven by market conditions, partially offset by an $82,700 decrease in production volumes. Our production volumes decreased to 643 mcf per day for the six months ended June 30, 2014 from 758 mcf per day for the six months ended June 30, 2013, a decrease of 115 mcf per day (15%). The overall decrease in natural gas production is primarily due to the normal decline inherent in the life of a well.  Oil Revenues. We drill wells primarily to produce natural gas, rather than oil, but some wells have limited oil production. Our oil revenues were $90,800 and $43,400 for the three months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively, an increase of $47,400 (109%). The $47,400 increase in oil revenues for the three months ended June 30, 2014 as compared to the prior year similar period was attributable to a $56,400 increase in production volumes, partially offset by a $9,000 decrease in oil prices after the effect of financial hedges. Our production volumes increased to 10 bbls per day for the three months ended June 30, 2014 from 5 bbls per day for the three months ended June 30, 2013, an increase of 5 bbls per day (100%).  Our oil revenues were $109,900 and $81,500 for the six months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively, an increase of $28,400 (35%). The $28,400 increase in oil revenues for the six months ended June 30, 2014 as compared to the prior year similar period was attributable to a $25,400 increase in production volumes and a $3,000 increase in oil prices after the effect of financial hedges. Our production volumes increased to 6 bbls per day for the six months ended June 30, 2014 from 5 bbls per day for the six months ended June 30, 2013, an increase of 1 bbls per day (20%).  Costs and Expenses. Production expenses were $187,800 and $176,500 for the three months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively, an increase of $11,300 (6%). Production expenses were $348,100 and $351,300 for the six months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively, a decrease of $3,200 (1%). The increase for the three months ended June 30, 2014 was mostly due to higher repairs and maintenance costs. The decrease for the six months ended June 30, 2014 was mostly due to lower supervision fees from wells being temporarily shut-in.  Depletion of oil and gas properties as a percentage of oil and gas revenues was 14% and 40% for the three months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively, and 14% and 43% for the six months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013, respectively. These percentage changes are directly attributable to changes in revenues, oil and gas reserve quantities, product prices and production volumes and changes in the depletable cost basis of oil and gas properties.  General and administrative expenses for the three months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013 were $28,800 and $33,900, respectively, a decrease of $5,100 (15%). For the six months ended June 30, 2014 and 2013 these expenses were $62,800 and $75,200, respectively, a decrease of $12,400 (16%). These expenses include third-party costs for services as well as the monthly administrative fees charged by our MGP. The changes for the three and six months ended June 30, 2014 are primarily due to third-party costs as compared to the prior year similar period.  Liquidity and Capital Resources  Cash provided by operating activities increased $20,300 in the six months ended June 30, 2014 to $204,500 as compared to $184,200 for the six months ended June 30, 2013. This increase was mostly due to an increase in net income before depletion and accretion, and non-cash loss on derivative value of $34,000 and a change in asset retirement obligations settled of $22,000. The increase was partially offset by a decrease in the change in accounts receivable trade-affiliate of $10,900, a decrease in the change in accrued liabilities of $4,600, the change in limited partner payable of $10,400, and the change in asset retirement receivable-affiliate of $9,800 for the six months ended June 30, 2014 compared to the six months ended June 30, 2013.  Cash provided by investing activities was $8,300 for the six months ended June 30, 2013, for proceeds from a sale of tangible equipment.  Cash used in financing activities increased $55,500 during the six months ended June 30, 2014 to $248,200 from $192,700 for the six months ended June 30, 2013. This increase was due to an increase in cash distributions to partners.  Any additional funds, if required, will be obtained from production revenues or borrowings from our MGP or its affiliates, which are not contractually committed to make loans to us. The amount that we may borrow may not at any time exceed 5% of our total subscriptions and we will not borrow from third-parties.  The Partnership is generally limited to the amount of funds generated by the cash flows from our operations, which we believe is adequate to fund future operations and distributions to our partners. Historically, there has been no need to borrow funds from our MGP to fund operations.  Critical Accounting Policies  The discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations is based upon our financial statements, which have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. On an on-going basis, we evaluate our estimates, including those related to our asset retirement obligations, depletion and certain accrued receivables and liabilities. We base our estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions that we believe reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form the basis for making judgments about the carrying values of assets and liabilities that are not readily apparent from other sources. Actual results may differ from these estimates under different assumptions or conditions. A discussion of significant accounting policies we have adopted and followed in the preparation of our financial statements is included within "Notes to Financial Statements" in Part I, Item 1, "Financial Statements" in this quarterly report and in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.  Aug 14, 2014  (c) 1995-2014 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


Three ways Draghi could burn the euro bulls


Here’s why oil just scored its biggest one-day rally of 2017


This is what it will take for bitcoin to become a legit currency

















Quote References


ARP

-0.10
-1.08%





Most Popular





Here’s why oil just scored its biggest one-day rally of 2017





AMD earnings give investors what they wanted — now it must deliver on servers





Don’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs





The highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart





Valerian: Luc Besson's $180 Million Indie Film




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found




























Arctic Paper S.A.
Sweden: Stockholm: ARP




kr9.15

-0.10
(-1.08%)








Volume56
Openkr9.15
Highkr9.15
Lowkr9.15
P/E Ratio5.2
Div Yield0
Market Cap634.5M
























 






















MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Open in:



Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



Credit


Currency


Markets


Supermarkets


Textiles


Gas Prices




Airlines


Oil


Currencies


U.S. Stocks


Retail


Federal Reserve




U.S. Dollar


United Kingdom


Europe


European Markets


Energy Stocks


Copper






People in the news



Trump, Donald


Buffett, Warren


Hill, David


Rather, Dan


Brin, Sergey


King, David




Lewis, Michael


Perry, Rick


Berlusconi, Silvio


McCain, John


Musk, Elon


Carter, Jimmy




Obama, Barack


Clinton, Bill


Jackson, Michael


Bloomberg, Michael


Putin, Vladimir


Snow, John






Companies in the news



Miners


Connor


American International Group


Lilly (Eli) & Co.


Dow Chemical


DuPont




Apple Inc.


American Manufacturing


Ford Motor


General Motors


Jones


3M Co




Bank of America Corp.


Caterpillar Inc.


Dow Jones & Co.


Google Inc.


McDonald's Corp.


News Corp.






Organizations in the news



European Union


Consumers Union


General Assembly


Small Business Administration


European Central Bank


Nasdaq Stock Market




World Bank


World Trade Organization


Bank of England


Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Investment Company Institute


New York Stock Exchange




College Board


New York University


State University of New York


University of Massachusetts


University of Washington


Washington State University












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




7:07 AM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Pre


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
7:07aSix Flags says rainy weather hurt attendance in Q2
7:06aHershey Q2 revenue $1.7 mln vs. $1.6 mln; FactSet consensus $1.7 mln
7:06aSix Flags Q2 FactSet EPS consensus 70 cents; revenue $438 mln
7:06aSix Flags Q2 revenue $422 million, up 4%
7:06aFord Motor Q2 automotive revenue $37.11 bln vs. $36.93 bln
7:05aSix Flags Q2 EPS 59 cents, down 8%
7:05aFord Motor Q2 F-Series sales up 7%
7:05aHershey Q2 adj. EPS $1.09; FactSet consensus 90 cents
7:04aHershey Q2 EPS 95 cents vs. 68 cents
7:04aWhole Foods earnings: Sales expected to fall
7:04aP&G earnings: What to expect
7:04aFord Motor sees 2017 adj. EPS $1.65-$1.85; FactSet consensus $1.51
7:03aFord Motor Q2 revenue $39.85 bln vs. $39.49 bln a year ago; FactSet consensus $37.28 bln
7:03aFord Motor Q2 adj. EPS 56 cents; FactSet consensus 43 cents
7:02aFord shares up 1.6% premarket
7:02aFord Motor Q2 EPS 51 cents vs. 49 cents a year ago
7:02aShares of AT&T are up 2.6% in premarket
7:01aCoca-Cola's stock jumps 1.4% premarket after Q2 results
7:01aWhat Trump's vow to repeal Dodd-Frank means for banks
7:00aCoca-Cola previous 2017 adj. EPS outlook was down 1% to down 3%
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,613.43

+100.26
+0.47%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,412.17

+1.37
+0.02%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.13

+7.22
+0.29%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 26, 2017 7:07 AM ET
Oil, Gas and Consumable Fuels

Company Overview of Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. drills and operates natural gas and oil wells in Pennsylvania and Tennessee. Atlas Resources, LLC serves as a managing general partner of the company. Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. was founded in 2005 and is based in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania.


Park Place Corporate Center OneSuite 4001000 Commerce DrivePittsburgh, PA 15275United StatesFounded in 2005



Phone: 412-489-0006








Key Executives for Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P.




Mr. Freddie M. Kotek


      	Chairman, CEO , President & SVP - Investment Partnership Div for Atlas Resources LLC
      


Age: 61
        







Mr. Jeffrey M. Slotterback


      	Chief Financial Officer of Atlas Resources LLC and Director of Atlas Resources LLC
      


Age: 35
        







Mr. Mark D. Schumacher


      	Chief Operating Officer of Atlas Resources, LLC
      


Age: 55
        







Mr. Daniel C. Herz


      	Executive Vice President of Atlas Resources LLC and Director of Atlas Resources LLC
      


Age: 40
        







Mr. Matthew J. Finkbeiner


      	Chief Accounting Officer of Atlas Resources LLC
      


Age: 37
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. Key Developments

Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. Files Form 15

Dec 9 16
Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. has announced that it has filed a Form 15 with the Securities and Exchange Commission to voluntarily deregister its Common units representing limited partnership interests under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.



Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. announced delayed 10-Q filing
May 17 16
On 05/17/2016, Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. announced that they will be unable to file their next 10-Q by the deadline required by the SEC.


Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. announced delayed annual 10-K filing
Mar 31 16
On 03/31/2016, Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. announced that they will be unable to file their next 10-K by the deadline required by the SEC.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 102 Oil Wells in East Texas Field United States 11 Good Energy, Inc. United States 1280 Horizons, LLC United States 1347 Energy Holdings LLC United States 15 Fields in Williston Basin United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P., please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P.
                    

•   PITTSBURGH, PA
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             Atlas America Series 26-2005 is based out of Pittsburgh.   
                                           














Summary
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)



   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P., enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel














Contact Info




atlas america series 26-2005 l.p.


PARK PLACE CORPORATE CENTER ONE

PITTSBURGH
PA
                                                        
                                                    15275


                                                      Business Phone:
                                                      412-489-0006
SEC SIC CODE:1311-CRUDE PETROLEUM & NATURAL GAS







Recent SEC Filings




15-12G filed on 12/09/2016
8-K filed on 12/09/2016
8-K filed on 10/31/2016
10-Q filed on 08/15/2016
8-K filed on 07/28/2016
10-Q filed on 05/23/2016
NT 10-Q filed on 05/17/2016
10-K filed on 04/14/2016
NT 10-K filed on 03/31/2016
10-Q filed on 11/23/2015
















Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...








Elevate your investments
Try it for free



















Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P.: CEO and Executives - Bloomberg








































  





















































































July 26, 2017 7:07 AM ET
Oil, Gas and Consumable Fuels

Company Overview of Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P.



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Key Executives for Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P.
NameBoard RelationshipsTitleAgeFreddie M. Kotek  18 RelationshipsChairman, CEO , President & SVP - Investment Partnership Div for Atlas Resources LLC61Jeffrey M. Slotterback  11 RelationshipsChief Financial Officer of Atlas Resources LLC and Director of Atlas Resources LLC35Mark D. Schumacher  No RelationshipsChief Operating Officer of Atlas Resources, LLC55Daniel C. Herz  12 RelationshipsExecutive Vice President of Atlas Resources LLC and Director of Atlas Resources LLC40Matthew J. Finkbeiner  No RelationshipsChief Accounting Officer of Atlas Resources LLC37
Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. Board Members*
NameBoard RelationshipsPrimary CompanyAgeFreddie M. Kotek   18 RelationshipsTitan Energy, LLC61Jeffrey M. Slotterback   11 RelationshipsAtlas Energy Group, LLC35Daniel C. Herz   12 RelationshipsTitan Energy, LLC40Gary   Lichenstein   5 RelationshipsAtlas America Public #12-2003 Limited Partnership69Christopher   Shebby   6 RelationshipsStifel, Nicolaus & Company, Incorporated51View All Board Members
Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. Executive Committees*
Committee NameChairpersonBoard RelationshipsMembersThere is no committee data available.
*Data is at least as current as the most recent Definitive Proxy.
Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



CEO COMPENSATION IN THIS INDUSTRY  Industry RangeSalary  326.4KBonus  387.8KTotal Short Term Compensation  417.1KTotal Value of Options  3.3MCompensation as of Fiscal Year   Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. CEO CompensationIndustry Average










INDUSTRY EXECUTIVE CHANGESNorthern Oil and Gas, Inc. Appoints Bahram Akradi to the Board of DirectorsJuly 24, 2017 12:00 PM ETZenith Energy Ltd Appoints Sergey Borovskiy as Non-Executive DirectorJuly 24, 2017 6:00 AM ETEland Oil & Gas plc Announces Executive ChangeJuly 24, 2017 6:00 AM ETMolopo Energy Limited Announces Resignation of Wayne Trumble as DirectorJuly 23, 2017 10:29 PM ETADX Energy Ltd Appoints Mr. Philip Haydn-Slater as Non-Executive DirectorJuly 23, 2017 10:26 PM ETSponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P., please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. - List of CEOs, founders and company directors

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P.
List of persons related to the company Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P.. Find out list of CEOs, founders, board members, and company directors of Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P..

CIK Number: 0001342514IRS Number: 202879859Industry: CRUDE PETROLEUM & NATURAL GAS [1311]Trading symbol: ATLSCompany address: PARK PLACE CORPORATE CENTER ONE 1000 COMMERCE DR. 4TH FLOOR PITTSBURGH 15275



People related to Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P.
NamePositionStreetCityCountryATLAS RESOURCES INC311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPAKAREN A  BLACK311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPAMARCI F  BLEICHMAR311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPAMICHAEL W  BRECKO311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPAFRANK P  CAROLAS311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPAMICHAEL G  HARTZELL311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPAJACK L  HOLLANDER311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPAFREDDIE M  KOTEK311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPADONALD R  LAUGHLIN311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPASHERWOOD S  LUTZ311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPANANCY J  MCGURK311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPAJEFFREY C  SIMMONS311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPAMICHAEL L  STAINES311 ROUSER RD. MOON TOWNSHIPPA




Atlas America Series 26-2005 L.P. on the Web
Related companiesAtlas Advantage Offshore Fund, Ltd., Atlas Aggregates Inc., Atlas Brown Inc, Atlas Capital Investors V ECI CORP, LLC, Atlas Capital Investors V Parallel, LP, Atlas Capital Investors V, LP, ATLAS CAPITAL L P, ATLAS CAPITAL QP LP, Atlas Capital Resources (P) II LP, Atlas Capital Resources II LP, Atlas Capital Resources LP, Atlas Commercial Partners LLC, Atlas Continuum Fund, L.P., ATLAS COPCO AB, ATLAS DALLAS INDUSTRIAL, LP












 








Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P.














































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog











Related Companies

1115638 Alberta Ltd
1115650 Alberta Ltd
3Tec Energy Corp
ARX Gold Corp
ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #12-2003 Limited Partnership
ATP Oil and Gas
Abby Inc
Abraxas Energy Partners LP
Abraxas Petroleum Corporation
Abu Dhabi Gas Industries Limited
Advanced Voice Recognition Systems, Inc
Alaska Pacific Energy Corp
Alliance Resources Plc
Alpha Energy
Alta Mesa Holdings, LP



        More Related Companies
      





Home



Sample Contracts



By Company


Atlas America Public #15 2005 (A) L.P.




Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P.





      Loading...
    





Former Names
Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) Program (until 2012-05-14) Atlas America Public #15-2005 Program (until 2006-05-15)Standard IndustryClassification
Crude petroleum & natural gasAddress

Park Place Corporate Center One, Pittsburgh, PA 15275
Phone
412-489-0006



Sample Contracts



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Assignment and Bill of Sale
(October 31st, 2016)
THIS ASSIGNMENT AND BILL OF SALE (this Assignment), dated October 25, 2016, is from each of the limited partnerships set forth on Exhibit A (each an Assignor and collectively, the Assignors) to Atlas Resources, LLC, a Pennsylvania limited liability company (Assignee), and is effective as of 12:01 a.m. Eastern Prevailing Time on October 1, 2016 (Effective Time).



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Amendment No. 1 to Amended and Restated Certificate and Agreement of Limited
Partnership of Atlas America Public #15-2005(A) L.P.
(July 28th, 2016)
THIS AMENDMENT NO. 1 to AMENDED AND RESTATED CERTIFICATE AND AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2005(A) L.P. (this Amendment), dated as of July 26, 2016, is entered into and effectuated by Atlas Resources, LLC (f/k/a Atlas Resources, Inc.), a Pennsylvania limited liability company and the managing general partner of Atlas America Public #15-2005(A) L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the Partnership), pursuant to authority granted to it in Section 8.05(b)(iv) of the Amended and Restated Certificate and Agreement of Limited Partnership of the Partnership, dated as of December 3, 2005 (as amended from time to time, the Limited Partnership Agreement). Capitalized terms used but not defined herein are used as defined in the Limited Partnership Agreement.



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Amended and Restated Certificate and Agreement of Limited Partnership For
(May 1st, 2006)
THIS       AMENDED AND RESTATED CERTIFICATE AND AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP       ("AGREEMENT"), amending and restating the original Certificate of Limited       Partnership, is made and entered into as of the date set forth below, by and       among Atlas Resources, Inc., referred to as "Atlas" or the "Managing General       Partner," and the remaining parties from time to time signing a Subscription       Agreement for Limited Partner Units, these parties sometimes referred to as       "Limited Partners," or for Investor General Partner Units, these parties       sometimes referred to as "Investor General Partners."



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Drilling and Operating Agreement for Atlas America Public #15-2005(A) L.P.
(May 1st, 2006)
THIS         AGREEMENT made this 3rd         day of         December, 2005, by and between ATLAS RESOURCES, INC., a Pennsylvania corporation         (hereinafter referred to as "Atlas" or "Operator"),



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
Exhibit 10.9                                                                    ------------                        GUARANTY AS OF DECEMBER 7, 2004 BETWEEN                   FIRSTENERGY CORP. AND ATLAS RESOURCES, INC.                  [GRAPHIC OMITTED]                                             76 South Main St.                                                               Akron, Ohio 44308 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------                                                                  1-800-533-4758      Guaranty dated as of December 7, 2004 by and between FirstEnergy Corp., an Ohio corporation, with its principal place of business at 76 South Main Street, Akron, OH 44308 ("Guarantor") and Atlas Resources Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation, with its principal place of business at 311 Rousar Rd., Coranpolls, PA 15108 ("Seller"). Seller, together with its affiliates Atlas Energy Group, Inc., an Ohio Corporation, Resource Energy, Inc., a D



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
Viking Resources Corp.                                      and     UGI Energy Services, Inc. d/b/a GASMARK - --------------------------------------------------------            --------------------------------------------------------------- XXX 10500                                                           1188 XXX Blvd., Suite 385, XXX - --------------------------------------------------------            --------------------------------------------------------------- Duns Number                                                         Duns Number 88-350-4581 - --------------------------------------------------------            --------------------------------------------------------------- Contract Number:                                                    Contract Number: - --------------------------------------------------------            --------------------------------------------------------------- U.S. Federal Tax ID Number:                                         U.S. Federal



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10.5                                                                    ------------                     OMNIBUS AGREEMENT DATED FEBRUARY 2, 2000 AMONG ATLAS                 AMERICA, INC., RESOURCE ENERGY, INC., AND VIKING               RESOURCES CORPORATION, AND ATLAS PIPELINE OPERATING               PARTNERSHIP, L.P., AND ATLAS PIPELINE PARTNERS, L.P.                                         OMNIBUS AGREEMENT           THIS OMNIBUS AGREEMENT is made as of February 2, 2000 among ATLAS AMERICA, INC., a Delaware corporation ("Atlas America"), RESOURCE ENERGY, INC., a Delaware corporation ("Resource Energy"), and VIKING RESOURCES CORPORATION, a Pennsylvania corporation (collectively with Atlas America and Resource Energy, the "Resource Entities"), and ATLAS PIPELINE OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership, and ATLAS PIPELINE PARTNERS, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (collectively, the "MLP").                                  R E C I T A L S:           A. T



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
Exhibit 10.3                                                                    ------------                                GUARANTY DATED AUGUST 12, 2003               BETWEEN FIRST ENERGY CORP. AND ATLAS RESOURCES, INC.                  TO GAS PURCHASE AGREEMENT DATED MARCH 31, 1999               BETWEEN NORTHEAST OHIO GAS MARKETING, INC., AND ATLAS              ENERGY GROUP, INC., ATLAS RESOURCES, INC., AND RESOURCE                                   ENERGY, INC.          FirstEnergy(R)                                                 76 South Main St.                                                                Akron, Ohio 44308  - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------                                                                    1-800-633-4766       Guaranty dated as of August 12, 2003 by and between FirstEnergy Corp., an Ohio corporation, with its principal place of business at 76 South Main Street, Akron, OH 44308 ("Guarantor") and



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10.12                                                                    -------------                     GUARANTY DATED JANUARY 1, 2005 BETWEEN UGI                      CORPORATION AND VIKING RESOURCES CORP.                                        GUARANTY          This Guaranty (the "Guaranty") is made by UGI Corporation ("Guarantor"), a Pennsylvania corporation, effective as of January 1, 2005 (the "Effective Date"), in favour of Viking Resources Corp. ("Creditor"), a Pennsylvania corporation.          WHEREAS, UGI Energy Services, Inc. d/b/a GASMARK ("Debtor"), a Pennsylvania corporation and Creditor are parties to various agreements for the purchase, sale and/or transportation of natural gas (whether one or more, the "Agreement"); and          WHEREAS, the execution and delivery of this Guaranty is a condition to Creditor's further performance of its obligations under the terms of the Agreement and Guarantor has agreed to provide assurance for the performance of Debtor's o



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
TABLE OF CONTENTS    SECTION NO.        DESCRIPTION                         PAGE           SECTION NO.      DESCRIPTION                         PAGE                                                                                                              I.      FORMATION                                                   VII.    DURATION, DISSOLUTION, AND         1.01   Formation..................................1                 WINDING UP         1.02   Certificate of Limited Partnership.........1                 7.01   Duration..................................47         1.03   Name, Principal Office and Residence.......1                 7.02   Dissolution and Winding Up................47         1.04   Purpose....................................1                                                                     VIII.   MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS II.     DEFINITION OF TERMS                                                 8.01   Notices...................................48        



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
INDEX  SECTION                                                                                                        PAGE                                                                                                           1.    Assignment of Well Locations; Representations and Indemnification Associated with the       Assignment of the Lease; Designation of Additional Well Locations;       Outside Activities Are Not Restricted.......................................................................1  2.    Drilling of Wells; Timing; Depth; Interest of Developer; Right to Substitute Well Locations.................2  3.    Operator - Responsibilities in General; Covenants; Term.....................................................3  4.    Operator's Charges for Drilling and Completing Wells; Payment; Completion Determination;       Dry Hole Determination; Excess Funds and Cost Overruns - Intangible Drilling Costs; Excess       Funds and Cost Overruns - Tangible Costs.................



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10.8                          GUARANTY DATED JUNE 1, 2004 BETWEEN UGI                      CORPORATION AND VIKING RESOURCES CORP.                                     BOX 858 VALLEY FORGE, PA 19482 o 610-337-1000  GRAPHIC UGI CORPORATION                                      June 8, 2004  VIA REGULAR MAIL  Atlas America, Inc. Attention: Michael Brecko 311 Rouser Road P.O. Box 611 Moon Township, PA 15108     RE. GUARANTY FOR UGI ENERGY SERVICES, INC.  Dear Mr. Brecko:     Enclosed is the executed original Guaranty made by UGI Corporation in favor of Viking Resources, Corp., effective as of March 1, 2004. This Guaranty is intended as credit assurance for the transactions of UGI Energy Services Inc., and is given in the amount of $7,000,000. This Guaranty supercedes the prior Guaranty between the parties, which was dated effective March 1, 2004.     If you have any questions concerning the foregoing, please contact me at (610) 337-1000, extension 3148.                               



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
EXHIBIT A                                                    THIRD PARTY PRODUCTION SOURCES                                    Attached to and made part of the Natural Gas Gathering Agreement                                     dated January 1, 2002 among ATLAS PIPELINE PARTNERS, L.P. AND                                              ATLAS PIPELINE OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.P.                                                      (collectively as Gatherer),                                                                  and                               ATLAS RESOURCES, INC., ATLAS ENERGY GROUP, INC., ATLAS NOBLE CORPORATION,                                        RESOURCE ENERGY INC., and VIKING RESOURCES CORPORATION                                                       (collectively as Shipper)            PURCHASER                             SELLER                                     WELLS                                                                         Atlas Energy Group, Inc.



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
Exhibit 10.11                     TRANSACTION CONFIRMATION DATED DECEMBER 14, 2004            BETWEEN ATLAS AMERICA, INC. AND UGI ENERGY SERVICES, INC.                                  D/B/A/ GASMARK                                                                     Revised EXHIBIT A                              TRANSACTION CONFIRMATION                              FOR IMMEDIATE DELIVERY               Atlas America, Inc.                      Date: December 14, 2004                                                       Transaction Confirmation                                                       #: ___________  This Transaction Confirmation is subject to the Base Contract between Seller and Buyer dated November 13, 2002. The terms of this Transaction Confirmation are binding unless disputed in writing within 2 Business Days of receipt unless otherwise specified in the Base Contract.  SELLER:                                 BUYER:  Atlas America, Inc.                     UGI Energy Ser



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10.2                                                                    ------------                          GAS PURCHASE AGREEMENT DATED MARCH 31, 1999               BETWEEN NORTHEAST OHIO GAS MARKETING, INC., AND ATLAS       ENERGY GROUP, INC., ATLAS RESOURCES, INC., AND RESOURCE ENERGY, INC.                                    GAS PURCHASE AGREEMENT           This Agreement made and entered into as of this 31st day of March, 1999, by and between Northeast Ohio Gas Marketing, Inc., an Ohio corporation ("Buyer") of P. O. Box 430, Lancaster, Ohio 43130-0430 and Atlas Energy Group, Inc., an Ohio corporation, Atlas Resources, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation and Resource Energy, Inc., a Delaware corporation (collectively "Seller" of 311 Rouser Road, P.O. Box 611, Coraopolis, Pennsylvania 15108.                                      RECITALS           WHEREAS, Buyer utilizes volumes of natural gas, hereinafter referred to as "gas", for its customers situated in Ohio and Pennsylvani



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
Exhibit 10.10                                                                    -------------         CONFIRMATION OF GAS PURCHASE AND SALES AGREEMENT DATED NOVEMBER 17, 2004  BETWEEN ATLAS RESOURCES, INC. ET. AL. AND FIRST ENERGY SOLUTIONS CORP. FOR THE   PERIOD FROM APRIL 1, 2006 THROUGH MARCH 31, 2007 PRODUCTION/CALENDAR PERIODS          - ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- To:          Mike Brecko              From:        David Frederick Co:          Atlas America            Co:          FESC Phone:       (412)262-2830x126        Phone:       (330)315-7367 Fax:         (412)262-3927            Fax:         (330)315-7250 Date:        November 17, 2004        Pages:       3 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------                  CONFIRMATION OF GAS PURCHASE AND SALES AGREEMENT  Per our phone conversations this morning, this will confirm the following new price trigger pursuant to the natural gas



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
TABLE OF CONTENTS                                                   -----------------                                                                                                             PAGE                                                                                                            ----                                                                                                        1.   Definitions..............................................................................................1 2.   Minimum Well Drilling Schedule; Initial and Subsequent Drilling; Election to Participate; Gathering......3 3.   Title; Lease Status; Assignment by Non-Operator; AMI Election............................................8 4.   Drilling and Certain Related Procedures; Abandonment....................................................11 5.   Other Operating Responsibilities of the Operator........................................................13 6.   Marketing of Natural 



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
EXHIBIT 4.1                                                                      -----------                           CERTIFICATE OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP                                       FOR                         ATLAS AMERICA SERIES 26-2005 L.P.                                                          DELAWARE                                  ---------------                                  The First State          I, HARRIET SMITH WINDSOR, SECRETARY OF STATE OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE, DO HEREBY CERTIFY THE ATTACHED IS A TRUE AND CORRECT COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF "ATLAS AMERICA SERIES 26-2005 L.P.", FILED IN THIS OFFICE ON THE TWENTY-SIXTH DAY OF MAY, A.D. 2005, AT 11:30 O'CLOCK A.M.                                                  [GRAPHIC OMITTED]    3976324  8100                      /s/ Harriet Smith Windsor 050439333                              -----------------------------------------                                        Harriet Smith Windsor, Se



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 28th, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10.4                         MASTER NATURAL GAS GATHERING AGREEMENT DATED             FEBRUARY 2, 2000 AMONG ATLAS PIPELINE PARTNERS, L.P. AND                ATLAS PIPELINE OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.P., ATLAS                 AMERICA, INC., RESOURCE ENERGY, INC., AND VIKING                              RESOURCES CORPORATION                              MASTER NATURAL GAS GATHERING AGREEMENT           THIS MASTER NATURAL GAS GATHERING AGREEMENT is made as of February 2, 2000, among ATLAS PIPELINE PARTNERS, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership, and ATLAS PIPELINE OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (collectively, "Gatherer"), ATLAS AMERICA, INC., a Delaware corporation ("Atlas America"), RESOURCE ENERGY, INC., a Delaware corporation ("Resource Energy"), and VIKING RESOURCES CORPORATION, a Pennsylvania corporation ( "Viking Resources," and collectively with Atlas America and Resource Energy, "Shipper").                                     Recitals:           



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 7th, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10(o)                                       ESCROW AGREEMENT                        ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(B) L.P.                             ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(B) L.P.                                  ESCROW AGREEMENT          THIS AGREEMENT is made to be effective as of ________________, 2006, by and among Atlas Resources, LLC, a Pennsylvania limited liability company (the "Managing General Partner"), Anthem Securities, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation ("Anthem"), the "Dealer-Manager," Atlas America Public #15-2006(B) L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the "Partnership") and National City Bank of Pennsylvania, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, as escrow agent (the "Escrow Agent").                                     WITNESSETH:         WHEREAS, the Managing General Partner intends to offer publicly for sale to qualified investors (the "Investors") up to 14,265.50 investor general partner interests and up to 507.10 limited partner interests in the Partnership (th



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(April 7th, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10(p)                                       ESCROW AGREEMENT                        ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(C) L.P.                            ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(C) L.P.                                  ESCROW AGREEMENT           THIS AGREEMENT is made to be effective as of ________________, 2006, by and among Atlas Resources, LLC, a Pennsylvania limited liability company (the "Managing General Partner"), Anthem Securities, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation ("Anthem"), the "Dealer-Manager," Atlas America Public #15-2006(C) L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the "Partnership") and National City Bank of Pennsylvania, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, as escrow agent (the "Escrow Agent").                                      WITNESSETH:         WHEREAS, the Managing General Partner intends to offer publicly for sale to qualified investors (the "Investors") up to __________ investor general partner interests and up to __________ limited partner interests in the Partnersh



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(March 1st, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10(P)                                       ESCROW AGREEMENT                        ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(C) L.P.                                               ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(C) L.P.                                  ESCROW AGREEMENT          THIS AGREEMENT is made to be effective as of ________________, 2006, by and among Atlas Resources, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the "Managing General Partner"), Anthem Securities, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation ("Anthem"), the "Dealer-Manager," Atlas America Public #15-2006(C) L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the "Partnership") and National City Bank of Pennsylvania, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, as escrow agent (the "Escrow Agent").                                     WITNESSETH:         WHEREAS, the Managing General Partner intends to offer publicly for sale to qualified investors (the "Investors") up to __________ investor general partner interests and up to ___ limited partner interests in the Partnership 



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(March 1st, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10(O)                                       ESCROW AGREEMENT                        ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(B) L.P.                                                      ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(B) L.P.                                  ESCROW AGREEMENT          THIS AGREEMENT is made to be effective as of ________________, 2006, by and among Atlas Resources, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the "Managing General Partner"), Anthem Securities, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation ("Anthem"), the "Dealer-Manager," Atlas America Public #15-2006(B) L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the "Partnership") and National City Bank of Pennsylvania, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, as escrow agent (the "Escrow Agent").                                     WITNESSETH:         WHEREAS, the Managing General Partner intends to offer publicly for sale to qualified investors (the "Investors") up to 14,265.5 investor general partner interests and up to 507.1 limited partner interests in the Partn



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(February 27th, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10(O)                                       ESCROW AGREEMENT                        ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(B) L.P.                                                      ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(B) L.P.                                  ESCROW AGREEMENT          THIS AGREEMENT is made to be effective as of ________________, 2006, by and among Atlas Resources, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the "Managing General Partner"), Anthem Securities, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation ("Anthem"), the "Dealer-Manager," Atlas America Public #15-2006(B) L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the "Partnership") and National City Bank of Pennsylvania, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, as escrow agent (the "Escrow Agent").                                     WITNESSETH:         WHEREAS, the Managing General Partner intends to offer publicly for sale to qualified investors (the "Investors") up to 14,265.5 investor general partner interests and up to 507.1 limited partner interests in the Partn



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(February 27th, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10(P)                                       ESCROW AGREEMENT                        ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(C) L.P.                                               ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(C) L.P.                                  ESCROW AGREEMENT          THIS AGREEMENT is made to be effective as of ________________, 2006, by and among Atlas Resources, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the "Managing General Partner"), Anthem Securities, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation ("Anthem"), the "Dealer-Manager," Atlas America Public #15-2006(C) L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the "Partnership") and National City Bank of Pennsylvania, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, as escrow agent (the "Escrow Agent").                                     WITNESSETH:         WHEREAS, the Managing General Partner intends to offer publicly for sale to qualified investors (the "Investors") up to __________ investor general partner interests and up to ___ limited partner interests in the Partnership 



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(October 3rd, 2005)




Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(October 3rd, 2005)
EXHIBIT 10(A)                                       ESCROW AGREEMENT                        ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2005(A) L.P.                            ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2005(A) L.P.                                  ESCROW AGREEMENT            THIS AGREEMENT is made to be effective as of ________________, 2005, by and among Atlas Resources, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the "Managing General Partner"), Anthem Securities, Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation ("Anthem"), the "Dealer-Manager," Atlas America Public #15-2005(A) L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (the "Partnership") and National City Bank of Pennsylvania, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, as escrow agent (the "Escrow Agent").                                     WITNESSETH:           WHEREAS, the Managing General Partner intends to offer publicly for sale to qualified investors (the "Investors") up to __________ investor general partner interests and up to __________ limited partner interests in the Partnership (the "Un



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(October 3rd, 2005)
EXHIBIT 4(E)                              CERTIFICATE OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP                                        FOR                       ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(D) L.P.                                             DELAWARE                          ----------------------------     PAGE I                                  The First State            I, HARRIET SMITH WINDSOR, SECRETARY OF STATE OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE, DO HEREBY CERTIFY THE ATTACHED IS A TRUE AND CORRECT COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF "ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(D) L.P.", FILED IN THIS OFFICE ON THE TWENTY-SIXTH DAY OF SEPTEMBER, A.D. 2005, AT 12 O'CLOCK P.M.   4035865 8100                         /s/ Harriet Smith Windsor                [GRAPHIC OMITTED]     ----------------------------------------- 050785589                            Harriet Smith Windsor, Secretary of State                                      AUTHENTICATION: 4182009                                      DATE: 09-26-05   



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(August 9th, 2005)
EXHIBIT 10(n)                                                                    -------------                     GUARANTY DATED JANUARY 1, 2005 BETWEEN UGI                      CORPORATION AND VIKING RESOURCES CORP.                                        GUARANTY          This Guaranty (the "Guaranty") is made by UGI Corporation ("Guarantor"), a Pennsylvania corporation, effective as of January 1, 2005 (the "Effective Date"), in favour of Viking Resources Corp. ("Creditor"), a Pennsylvania corporation.          WHEREAS, UGI Energy Services, Inc. d/b/a GASMARK ("Debtor"), a Pennsylvania corporation and Creditor are parties to various agreements for the purchase, sale and/or transportation of natural gas (whether one or more, the "Agreement"); and          WHEREAS, the execution and delivery of this Guaranty is a condition to Creditor's further performance of its obligations under the terms of the Agreement and Guarantor has agreed to provide assurance for the performance of Debtor's o



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(August 9th, 2005)
EXHIBIT A                                                    THIRD PARTY PRODUCTION SOURCES                                    Attached to and made part of the Natural Gas Gathering Agreement                                     dated January 1, 2002 among ATLAS PIPELINE PARTNERS, L.P. AND                                              ATLAS PIPELINE OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.P.                                                      (collectively as Gatherer),                                                                  and                               ATLAS RESOURCES, INC., ATLAS ENERGY GROUP, INC., ATLAS NOBLE CORPORATION,                                        RESOURCE ENERGY INC., and VIKING RESOURCES CORPORATION                                                       (collectively as Shipper)            PURCHASER                             SELLER                                     WELLS                                                                         Atlas Energy Group, Inc.



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(August 9th, 2005)
EXHIBIT 10(e)                         MASTER NATURAL GAS GATHERING AGREEMENT DATED             FEBRUARY 2, 2000 AMONG ATLAS PIPELINE PARTNERS, L.P. AND                ATLAS PIPELINE OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.P., ATLAS                 AMERICA, INC., RESOURCE ENERGY, INC., AND VIKING                              RESOURCES CORPORATION                              MASTER NATURAL GAS GATHERING AGREEMENT           THIS MASTER NATURAL GAS GATHERING AGREEMENT is made as of February 2, 2000, among ATLAS PIPELINE PARTNERS, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership, and ATLAS PIPELINE OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership (collectively, "Gatherer"), ATLAS AMERICA, INC., a Delaware corporation ("Atlas America"), RESOURCE ENERGY, INC., a Delaware corporation ("Resource Energy"), and VIKING RESOURCES CORPORATION, a Pennsylvania corporation ( "Viking Resources," and collectively with Atlas America and Resource Energy, "Shipper").                                     Recitals:          



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(August 9th, 2005)
EXHIBIT 4(b)                                                                     ------------                          CERTIFICATE OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP                                        FOR                       ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(B) L.P.                                              DELWARE                               ---------------------      PAGE 1                                  THE FIRST STATE       I, HARRIET SMITH WINDSOR, SECRETARY OF STATE OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE, DO HEREBY CERTIFY THE ATTACHED IS A TRUE AND CORRECT COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF "ATLAS AMERICA PUBLIC #15-2006(B) L.P.", FILED IN THIS OFFICE ON THE TWENTY-FIFTH DAY OF JULY, A.D. 2005, AT 11 O'CLOCK A.M.                                        HARRIET SMITH WINDSOR                                       ------------------------------------------                [LOGO APPEARS HERE]    HARRIET SMITH WINDSOR, SECRETARY OF STATE  4004928 8100                             AUTHENTI



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(August 9th, 2005)
Exhibit 10(d)                                                                    -------------                                GUARANTY DATED AUGUST 12, 2003               BETWEEN FIRST ENERGY CORP. AND ATLAS RESOURCES, INC.                  TO GAS PURCHASE AGREEMENT DATED MARCH 31, 1999               BETWEEN NORTHEAST OHIO GAS MARKETING, INC., AND ATLAS              ENERGY GROUP, INC., ATLAS RESOURCES, INC., AND RESOURCE                                   ENERGY, INC.          FirstEnergy(R)                                                 76 South Main St.                                                                Akron, Ohio 44308  - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------                                                                    1-800-633-4766       Guaranty dated as of August 12, 2003 by and between FirstEnergy Corp., an Ohio corporation, with its principal place of business at 76 South Main Street, Akron, OH 44308 ("Guarantor") a



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(August 9th, 2005)
EXHIBIT 10(i)                          GUARANTY DATED JUNE 1, 2004 BETWEEN UGI                      CORPORATION AND VIKING RESOURCES CORP.                                     BOX 858 VALLEY FORGE, PA 19482 o 610-337-1000  GRAPHIC UGI CORPORATION                                      June 8, 2004  VIA REGULAR MAIL  Atlas America, Inc. Attention: Michael Brecko 311 Rouser Road P.O. Box 611 Moon Township, PA 15108     RE. GUARANTY FOR UGI ENERGY SERVICES, INC.  Dear Mr. Brecko:     Enclosed is the executed original Guaranty made by UGI Corporation in favor of Viking Resources, Corp., effective as of March 1, 2004. This Guaranty is intended as credit assurance for the transactions of UGI Energy Services Inc., and is given in the amount of $7,000,000. This Guaranty supercedes the prior Guaranty between the parties, which was dated effective March 1, 2004.     If you have any questions concerning the foregoing, please contact me at (610) 337-1000, extension 3148.                              



Atlas America Public #15-2005 (A) L.P. –
Contract
(August 9th, 2005)
Exhibit 10(j)                                                                    -------------                        GUARANTY AS OF DECEMBER 7, 2004 BETWEEN                   FIRSTENERGY CORP. AND ATLAS RESOURCES, INC.                  [GRAPHIC OMITTED]                                             76 South Main St.                                                               Akron, Ohio 44308 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------                                                                  1-800-533-4758      Guaranty dated as of December 7, 2004 by and between FirstEnergy Corp., an Ohio corporation, with its principal place of business at 76 South Main Street, Akron, OH 44308 ("Guarantor") and Atlas Resources Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation, with its principal place of business at 311 Rousar Rd., Coranpolls, PA 15108 ("Seller"). Seller, together with its affiliates Atlas Energy Group, Inc., an Ohio Corporation, Resource Energy, Inc., a













×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.










Contract and Agreement Category List











































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog







Sample Contract Categories 

a

b

c

d

e

f

g

h

i

j

k

l

m

n

o

p

q

r

s

t

u

v

w

x

y

z


abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz


337k
		Delaware
	

277k
		New York
	

113k
		California
	

70k
		Texas
	

68k
		Agreement
	

62k
		Nevada
	

46k
		Florida
	

44k
		Maryland
	

40k
		Illinois
	

38k
		Employment Agreement
	

38k
		Washington
	

37k
		Amended And Restated
	

36k
		Massachusetts
	

34k
		New Jersey
	

33k
		Pennsylvania
	

28k
		Georgia
	

28k
		Colorado
	

26k
		Ohio
	

25k
		Minnesota
	

25k
		Virginia
	

21k
		North Carolina
	

20k
		Incentive Plan
	

19k
		Credit Agreement
	

19k
		Amendment
	

16k
		Connecticut
	

16k
		Michigan
	

15k
		Indiana
	

14k
		Registration Rights Agreement
	

14k
		Recitals
	

13k
		Tennessee
	

13k
		Arizona
	

13k
		Missouri
	

12k
		Purchase Agreement
	

12k
		Promissory Note
	

12k
		Indenture
	

11k
		Warrant
	

11k
		Louisiana
	

11k
		Kansas
	

11k
		Utah
	

11k
		Wisconsin
	

10k
		Oklahoma
	

9k
		Securities Purchase Agreement
	

9k
		Agreement And Plan Of Merger
	

8k
		Iowa
	

8k
		Supplemental Indenture
	

8k
		Note
	

8k
		Equity Incentive Plan
	

7k
		Kentucky
	

7k
		Stock Purchase Agreement
	

7k
		Alabama
	














×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.











Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Visitors Insurance, Travel Health Insurance USA - VisitorsInsurance.com



































 info@visitorsinsurance.com











  
 Any questions  please call
1.800.344.9540 (Toll Free - USA / Canada) 1.847.897.5120  ( Local )















Home(current)

Travel Visitor Products







Core Products

Visitors Insurance Plans
Pre-existing Condition Plans
Green card / Immigrant Plans
US Citizens Traveling Abroad
Long term int'l Insurance (H1/L1)
Int'l Group Travel Insurance





Specialty Products


Schengen Visa Travel Insurance
Student Insurance(F1/J1 & OPT)
US Student Study Abroad Plan
Trip cancellation/Interruption
Missionary Medical Insurance





Domestic Plans

Major Medical ACA Plans
Short Term Medical Plans
Dental & Vision Insurance
Term & Universal Life Insurance





Employee Benefits for IT Companies


Low Cost Group Insurance (H1/B1 Emp) 

Group Insurance for IT Companies 







Client Resources







Find a PPO Doctor/Hospital

IMG PPO Network
Tokiomarine HCC PPO network
Azimuth Risk PPO Network
Seven Corners PPO Network
Trawick International PPO Network
IMG Int’l Doctors/Hospitals list





Renewal Links

IMG Renewal
Tokiomarine HCC Plans Renewal
Seven Corners Renewal
Trawick International Renewal





Claim Forms


IMG Claim Form 
Tokiomarine HCC Plans Claim form

Medex plans Claim form 

Azimuth Risk Solution Claim Form 

Seven Corners Claim Form 

Trawick International Claim Form 





Other Links


Print IMG ID card 
IMG Embassy Visa Letter 
Trawick Int'l Partial Refund Form
Become a subagent 
FAQs







About Us
Contact Us







Atlas Travel® Insurance
                    Comprehensive plan without sub limits













Atlas Travel® Insurance 
Get Quote Apply Online








For international travel, Atlas Travel® Insurance provides customizable coverage for travelers looking to cover specific needs while abroad.
International travel can represent financial risk. The benefits of many standard medical insurance policies do not apply beyond the borders of your home country. An Atlas Travel® Insurance
                                        plan can be the difference between a trip ruined by unexpected illness or injury, versus a trip with access to quality care and financial help if the unexpected strikes.
HCC has developed two Atlas Travel® plans that offer a complete package of international benefits available 24 hours a day. Atlas America® provides coverage for non-U.S. citizens traveling outside their home country while Atlas International provides coverage for US citizens traveling outside their home country.
Important things you should know about Atlas Visitors Insurance
There are many different types of insurance policies that are around today, but one of the best ones you can try out is the Atlas America Visitor Insurance policy. The medical insurance policy is available to visitors in the United States, as well as all foreign tourists who are traveling to the United States for business or for leisure. There is massive demand for this travel insurance package, because it is available for new immigrants in the United States, as well as international students, and overseas travelers as well.



 
Read More











Important Links


 Brochure
 Application



Find a Doctor/Hospital
Claim Form
Renewal
Policy Wording
Cancellation & Refund policy
Excluded/Eligibility of States of Residence









Customer Support






Toll Free
 1-800-344-9540







Local
 1-847-897-5120




Please call us if you need more information about Visitors Insurance plans or Other plans which we offer










Benefits
Rates 
Exclusions
Claims
FAQS






BENEFIT
LIMIT


Deductibles
$0, $100, $250, $500, $1,000 or $2,500 per certificate period


Coinsurance – Claims incurred in U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 80% of the next $5,000 of 
                                            eligible expenses after the deductible, then 100% to the overall maximum 
                                            limit. Coinsurance will be waived if expenses are incurred within the PPO 
                                            and expenses are submitted to underwriters for review and payment 
                                            directly to the provider.
                                        


Coinsurance – Claims incurred outside U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 100% of eligible expenses after the 
                                            deductible up to the overall maximum limit


Hospital Room and Board
Average semi-private room rate, including nursing services


Local Ambulance
Usual, reasonable and customary charges, when covered illness or injury results in 
                                            hospitalization as inpatient


Intensive Care Unit
Usual, reasonable and customary charges


Emergency Room Copayment
In addition to coinsurance, the member shall be responsible for a $200 
                                            copayment for each use of emergency room for an illness unless the 
                                            member is admitted to the hospital. There will be no copayment for 
                                            emergency room treatment of an injury.


Urgent Care Center
For each visit, the member shall be responsible for a $50 copayment, after 
                                            which coinsurance will apply. Not subject to deductible.


Hospital Indemnity
$100  per  day  of  inpatient  hospitalization  (not  subject  to  deductible  or  coinsurance)


Physical Therapy
$50 maximum per day


All Other Eligible Medical Expenses
Usual, reasonable and customary charges


Acute Onset of Pre-existing Condition(excludes chronic and congenital conditions) (only available to members under age 70) 
 Overall maximum limit. $25,000 lifetime maximum for Emergency Medical Evacuation.


Emergency Dental (acute onset of pain)
$250 limit per certificate period (not subject to deductible or  
                                            coinsurance)


Emergency Medical Evacuation
$1,000,000 lifetime maximum, except as provided under acute onset of preexisting 
                                            condition (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)



                                            Return of Minor Children

                                            $50,000 per certificate period (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)
                                            Repatriation of Remains
                                            Overall maximum limit (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)


Pet  Return
Up to $1,000 to return a traveling pet home if member is hospitalized


Repatriation of Remains
Overall maximum limit (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)



                                            Emergency Reunion
                                        
                                            $50,000 limit per certificate period, subject to a maximum of 15 days  
                                            (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)


         
                                            Natural Disaster

                                            Maximum $100 a day for 5 days (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)



                                            Trip Interruption
                                        

                                            $5,000 limit per certificate period (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)



                                            Trip Delay
                                        

                                            $100 for a 12-hour delay requiring an unplanned overnight stay (2 days maximum).



                                            Lost Checked Luggage
                                        

                                            $500 limit per certificate period (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)
                                        



                                            Political Evacuation
                                        

                                            $10,000 lifetime maximum (not subject to deductible or coinsurance)
                                        



                                            Terrorism
                                        

                                            $50,000 maximum lifetime limit, eligible medical expenses only



                                            Accidental Death and Dismemberment 
                                            (excludes loss due to common carrier accident; $250,000 
                                            maximum benefit per any one family or group) 

                                            Not subject to deductible or coinsurance
                                        



                                            Members up to age 18
                                        

                                            Lifetime max. - $5,000; Death - $5,000; Loss of 2 limbs - $5,000; Loss of 1 limb - $2,500
                                        



                                            Members under age 18 through 69
                                        

                                            Lifetime max. - $50,000; Death - $50,000; Loss of 2 limbs - $50,000; Loss of 1 limb - $25,000
                                            Optional Accidental Death & Dismemberment buy-up of $50,000 to Lifetime max. $100,000
                                        



                                            Members under age 70 through 74
                                        

                                            Lifetime max. - $12,500; Death - $12,500; Loss of 2 limbs - $12,500; Loss of 1 limb - $6,250
                                        



                                            Members under age 75 and older
                                        

                                            Lifetime max. - $6,250; Death - $6,250; Loss of 2 limbs - $6,250; Loss of 1 limb - $3,125
                                        



                                            Common Carrier Accidental Death
                                            ($250,000 maximum benefit per any one family or group)
                                        

                                            Not subject to deductible or coinsurance
                                            Up to age 18 - $25,000 per member; Age 18 through 69 - $50,000 per member;
                                            Age 70 to 74 - $12,500 per member; Age 75 and older - $6,250
                                        



                                            Overall Maximum Limit Per Certificate Period
                                        

                                            Age 80 or older - $10,000; Age 70 to 79 - $50,000 or $100,000;
                                            All others - $50,000, $100,000, $200,000, $500,000 or $1,000,000

                                        



                                            Crisis Response
                                        

                                            $10,000 limit per certificate period;  Includes access to Unity Crisis Group services.
                                            Optional Crisis Response buy-up of $90,000 to Lifetime max. $100,000

                                        



                                            Personal Liability
                                        

                                            $10,000 lifetime maximum.
                                            Optional Personal Liability buy-up of $90,000 to Lifetime max. $100,000

                                        



                                            Bedside Visit
                                        

                                            $1,500 (economy ticket for family member to visit if member admitted to ICU).

                                        





Certain types of medical expenses are excluded from coverage under Atlas Travel® insurance. Some exclusions are listed here. Refer the Description of Coverage for the complete list of exclusions.

Pre-existing conditions — charges resulting directly or indirectly from any pre-existing condition, as herein defined, are excluded from this insurance unless it is a sudden and unexpected outbreak or recurrence that is of short duration and requires urgent care. Under Atlas Travel®, no coverage is available for known, scheduled, required, or expected medical care, drugs, or treatments existent or necessary prior to the effective date of coverage.
Routine medical examinations
Routine pre-natal care, pregnancy, child birth, and post-natal care
Medical expenses for injury or illness resulting from participation in extreme sports (see Description of Coverage for full list of excluded sports).



 



Does Atlas Travel® provide any coverage while I am in my home country?
Atlas Travel® does offer medical expense coverage in your home country in the following situations:

                                                Benefit Period –Atlas Travel® will cover eligible medical expenses in the member’s home country for 90 days after the beginning of treatment so long as the related illness or injury began while the certificate was still in effect and treatment began while the member was outside their home country.

                                                Incidental Home Country Coverage – For U.S. citizens, medical expenses are only covered during incidental trips home totaling no more than 15 days per three-month period of coverage. Incidental visit time must be used within the three-month period earned, and the member must continue his or her international trip in order to be eligible for this benefit. Medical expenses for non-U.S. citizens will be covered up to a maximum of 30 days for any three-month period. Medical expenses incurred in your home country will not be covered if your purpose for returning to your home country is to obtain treatment of an illness or injury that began while traveling. 
Will Atlas Travel® cover me on trips of a year or longer?
For non-U.S. citizens or residents whose travel does not include the U.S. or U.S. territories, the maximum coverage duration is 365 days. Additionally, coverage may be renewed up to 2 additional coverage periods. Coverage renewal requires satisfaction of a new deductible and coinsurance. Renewals may be filed through the Client Zone.
                                                For all other travelers, the maximum duration is 364 days, and coverage is not renewable. 
How do I cancel my Atlas Travel® coverage?
You may submit a written cancellation request to HCCMIS prior to the effective date of coverage for a full refund. If HCCMIS receives the cancellation request following the effective date of coverage, only the unused portion of premium will be refunded. A $25 cancellation fee will apply.
Will Atlas Travel® cover multiple trips? 
No. Atlas Travel® coverage is purchased for a duration you specify and applies to a single trip only. For coverage that applies to multiple trips, our Atlas MultiTrip™ product may work for you. 
Are there any countries not covered in my Atlas Travel® plan? 
Yes. Certain travel restrictions declared by the U.S. State Department, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), and certain OFAC sanctions, affect Atlas Travel® coverage.
Who is eligible for an Atlas Travel® insurance plan?
Anyone who is at least 14 days old and traveling internationally is eligible for coverage. . Policies must cover a minimum of five days; however, travel is not required for all five days. Applicants under age 70 may select an overall maximum limit ranging from $50,000 to $1,000,000. The overall maximum limit for members age 70 - 79 is $100,000, and the overall maximum limit for members over age 80 is $10,000 ($20,000 under Atlas Premium).
If I purchase an Atlas Travel® Insurance plan, when does coverage become effective, and when does it end?
Your Atlas Travel® insurance coverage becomes effective on the latest of:

the moment we receive your application and correct premium (if application and payment is made online or by fax)
12:01am on the date we receive your application and payment (if application and payment are made by mail)
the moment you depart from your home country
12:01am on the date you request on your application

Your coverage will end on the earliest of:

11:59pm on the last day of the period for which you have paid a premium,
11:59pm on the date requested on your application,
the moment of your arrival upon return to your home country (unless you have started a benefit period or are eligible for home country coverage)


Is Atlas Travel® extendable?
Following the initial purchase, Atlas Travel® coverage may be extended up to 364 days past the original effective date of coverage. Extension does not require satisfaction of a new deductible or coinsurance. File all extensions through the HCCMIS Client Zone with payment by credit card.
Will Atlas Travel® cover my dependents?
Yes.  You may purchase Atlas Travel® coverage for your spouse and any number of additional dependents. 
What is covered under the Atlas Travel® insurance plan?
To see an overview of the benefits provided under Atlas Travel® insurance coverage, please review our Atlas Travel® Insurance Coverage page. 
How do I extend or renew my Atlas Travel® insurance coverage?
After your initial purchase, you may extend your coverage (5 day minimum) up to a maximum of 364 days from the initial effective date. Provided there is no break in coverage, you will not be required to re-satisfy the Deductible and Coinsurance nor will benefit limits be reset. If you are covered under Atlas International, after 364 days of continuous coverage you may renew your coverage for up to two additional coverage periods. Deductible and Coinsurance must be re-satisfied as of each renewal date. If a new application is required, then you must re-satisfy your Deductible, Coinsurance and Pre-existing Condition provisions.
Extensions or renewals must be made online in the Client Zone with payment by credit card.

How do I extend my Atlas Travel® Insurance?

Follow the below instructions to EXTEND your Atlas Travel® medical insurance plan:

Go to the HCC Client Zone at: https://zone.hccmis.com/clientzone/
To login, you will need to enter your Certificate/ID number (ID #) and your password.  If you don’t know your password, click the “forgot password“? button and enter your Certificate ID (ID #) and your date of birth.  Click “Login.“?
Click "Extend Coverage".?
Enter the extension of coverage date. Click “Recalculate.“? Click “Proceed to Payment Page.“?
Enter payment information.  Click “Extend My Coverage.“?
The email you enter in the payment information will receive coverage confirmation. 











      






 
LIFE INSURANCE QUOTES 
                            IN 3 EASY STEPS



 BECOME OUR SUBAGENT 



IMG-POLICY RENEWAL LINK










     



 





















    Atlas America Insurance































800-605-2282 Sign In | 



—
















Atlas America® Insurance


ATLAS TRAVEL®
Customizable travel medical insurance for single trips.
LEARN MORE
or
Get a Quote

Finally taking that trip you’ve always dreamed of to the United States? Whether you’re planning to travel solo or with your family for work, school, or pleasure, you’re probably equal parts excited and stressed.
For international visitors unfamiliar with the U.S. healthcare system, questions of health and safety can be a major source of travel anxiety. Would you be able to seek treatment if you suffered an injury or unexpected illness while exploring the country? Would your medical expenses be covered by your home country health insurance policy?
If the answer to either of these questions is no, then it’s time to explore your travel medical insurance options.
What is Atlas America insurance?
Atlas America is a travel medical insurance policy for non-U.S. citizens and residents visiting the United States. Available to individuals, families, and groups, Atlas America insurance can cover individuals from most countries who are at least 14 days old and traveling to the U.S. from abroad.
Policies must cover a minimum of 5 days, though you do not have to travel all 5 days to be eligible for coverage. Coverage is available up to 364 days.

Why do I need insurance for my trip to the U.S.?
Your home country health insurance policy may not cover you across international lines – or it may provide very limited international coverage. And in the United States, people are responsible for their own healthcare costs, meaning you’ll be financially responsible for any medical expenses stemming from an unexpected illness or injury.
According to healthcare.gov, a broken leg can cost up to $7,500 to fix in the United States, and the average cost of a 3-day hospital stay is around $30,000.
Travel medical insurance, as noted by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), can reduce “the cost of a medical emergency" and the resulting “financial burden on travelers" by providing access to quality care and financial help if the unexpected occurs as you travel throughout the United States.
It can also serve as evidence that you’ll be able to pay for medical expenses incurred during your time in the U.S., which may be required if you need a visa to enter the country.


What benefits does Atlas America provide?
Atlas America insurance provides benefits for eligible medical expenses incurred in the U.S., including Hospital Room and Board, Local Ambulance, Emergency Medical Evacuation, Intensive Care Unit, and all other eligible costs.
It also provides supplemental travel benefits like Trip Interruption, Travel Delay, and Lost Checked Luggage.
Key features of Atlas America insurance include:

Up to $2,000,000 in maximum coverage per covered injury or illness and per certificate period
Your choice of deductible ranging from $0 to $2,500 per certificate period
Coinsurance at 80% of the next $5,000 of eligible expenses after the deductible, then 100% to the maximum coverage limit. Within the Preferred Provider Network (PPO), coinsurance is waived and eligible expenses are paid at 100% after the deductible, up to the overall maximum.
Provider network with over 5,000 hospitals and more than 90,000 healthcare facilities throughout the U.S.
Free travel assistance services available in multiple languages 365 days a year

Other Atlas America highlights:

Accidental Death & Dismemberment (AD&D)
Repatriation of Remains
Political Evacuation
Terrorism
Natural Disaster
Personal Liability

To see the full list of Atlas America insurance benefits and exclusions, see the Description of Coverage. 

Why choose Atlas America insurance?
Flexibility: Atlas America policies are affordable and flexible, allowing you to select the deductible, length of coverage, and coverage maximum that best align with your travel needs.
Plus, if you need to extend your coverage after you purchase your policy, you can extend (5-day minimum) up to a maximum of 364 days from your initial coverage start date. Provided there is no break in coverage, you will not be required to re-satisfy your deductible or coinsurance and your benefit limits will not reset.
Ease-of-Use: Purchasing Atlas America insurance is fast and easy – online fulfillment is available immediately and no health screenings are required for acceptance. Plus, our provider network covers all 50 states, with easy access for the majority of the U.S.
When you purchase an Atlas America insurance policy, you will also receive a fulfillment document with detailed instructions on how to use it. These instructions will explain how to seek medical treatment, how to file a claim, and how to contact the customer service department with any additional questions you may have.
Year-Round Assistance: As an Atlas America policyholder, you will receive access to our full line of travel assistance services, available in multiple languages 365 days a year. These services include:

Lost passport and travel documents assistance
Tracking for lost luggage
Assistance with emergency cash transfers
Embassy and consulate referrals
Legal and accounting referrals
Provider referrals

Does Atlas America meet visa requirements?
As a USA visitor, you may need a visa in order to gain entry to the United States. Whether or not you’ll need a visa is determined by your country of citizenship. The type of visa you'll need is dependent on the purpose of your travel.
Here are just a few common USA visitor visa types:

Visitor Visa: For people coming to the U.S. for a short period of time – typically 6 months or less – to visit children or relatives, tour, or vacation
Temporary Worker Visa: For individuals coming to the U.S. for a fixed period of time to receive job training or perform short-term or seasonal work
J-1 Visa: For USA visitors enrolling in work-and-study-based exchange programs in order to teach, study, conduct research, or receive on-site job training in the U.S.

In order to be approved for your visa, you’ll need to fulfill visa requirements. While your visa may not require you to have travel medical insurance, it may require you to show proof of funds to cover expenses incurred in the United States.
One way to evidence these funds is to purchase a travel medical policy like Atlas America, which provides policyholders with a visa letter to serve as proof of medical coverage.
Atlas America also meets the minimum insurance requirements of a J-1 visa as established by the U.S. Department of State.
Get a Quote











KHE2FFFYH6SP-152-894
Tokio Marine HCC - Medical Insurance Services Group (MIS Group) is a service company and a member of the Tokio Marine HCC group of companies. Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group has authority to enter into contracts of insurance on behalf of the Lloyd's underwriting members of Lloyd's Syndicate 4141, which is managed by Tokio Marine HCC – International Group.






























    Atlas Travel® Insurance































800-605-2282 Sign In | 



—
















Atlas Travel® Insurance
For international travel, Atlas Travel insurance provides customizable coverage for travelers looking to cover specific needs while abroad.
Perfect for:

Travelers wanting to build a custom plan
Coverage balance between the essentials and more specific needs

Need something different? Compare all Atlas Travel medical insurance plan levels.
Why do I need travel medical insurance?
International travel can represent financial risk. The benefits of many standard medical insurance policies do not apply beyond the borders of your home country. An Atlas Travel medical insurance plan can be the difference between a trip ruined by unexpected illness or injury, versus a trip with access to quality care and financial help if the unexpected strikes.














Quote
 
 


Benefits
Exclusions
Claim
FAQs
Glossary
Quote









Benefit1
Details


Deductibles
$0, $100, $250, $500, $1,000, or $2,500 per certificate period



Maximum Coverage per Injury or Illness
Age 70 to 79: $50,000 or $100,000
Age 80 or older: $10,000
All others: $50,000, $100,000, $200,000, $500,000, $1,000,000, or $2,000,000


Maximum Coverage per Certificate Period
(Excludes Emergency Medical Evacuation, Accidental Death & Dismemberment, Common Carrier Accidental Death, Personal Liability and Crisis Response)
Age 70 to 79: $50,000 or $100,000  Age 80 or older: $10,000  All others: $50,000, $100,000, $200,000, $500,000, $1,000,000, or $2,000,000


Coinsurance – Claims Incurred in U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 80% of next $5,000 of eligible expenses after the deductible, then 100% to maximum coverage limit


Coinsurance – Claims Incurred Outside U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 100% of eligible expenses after the deductible up to the maximum coverage limit


Hospital Room and Board
Average semi-private room rate, including nursing services


Local Ambulance
Usual, reasonable and customary charges, when covered illness or injury results in hospitalization as inpatient


Emergency Room Co-Payment – Claims Incurred in U.S. or Canada
$200 co-payment for each use of emergency room for illness, unless member is admitted to the hospital. No co-payment for emergency room treatment of an injury.


Intensive Care Unit
Usual, reasonable and customary charges


Physical Therapy and Chiropractic Care
$50 maximum per day. Must be ordered in advance by a physician.


Terrorism
$50,000 maximum lifetime limit, eligible medical expenses only


All Other Eligible Medical Expenses
Usual, reasonable and customary charges






Benefit2
Details



Emergency Medical Evacuation
$1,000,000 lifetime maximum


Repatriation of Remains
Overall maximum limit


Local Burial or Cremation
$5,000 lifetime maximum


Accidental Death and Dismemberment (AD&D)
Excludes loss due to common carrier accident $250,000 maximum benefit for any one family or group  Members under age 18: Lifetime maximum: $5,000 Death: $5,000 Loss of 2 limbs: $5,000 Loss of 1 limb: $2,500  Members age 18—69: Lifetime maximum: $50,000 Death: $50,000 Loss of 2 limbs: $50,000 Loss of 1 limb: $25,000 
Optional Accidental Death & Dismemberment buy-up of $50,000 to Lifetime Maximum of $100,000.
 Members age 70—74: Lifetime maximum: $12,500 Death: $12,500 Loss of 2 limbs: $12,500 Loss of 1 limb: $6,250  Members age 75 and older: Lifetime maximum: $6,250 Death: $6,250 Loss of 2 limbs: $6,250 Loss of 1 limb: $3,125


Common Carrier Accidental Death
Per member; subject to a maximum of $250,000 any one family or group:

Members under age 18: $25,000
Members age 18—69: $50,000
Members age 70—74: $12,500
Members age 75 and older: $6,250


Crisis Response—Ransom, Personal Belongings, and Crisis Response Fees and Expenses
$10,000 maximum per certificate period. Optional Crisis Response buy-up with Natural Disaster Evacuation Coverage: $90,000 per certificate period, with $10,000 maximum for Natural Disaster Evacuation.


Emergency Reunion
$50,000 per certificate period, subject to a maximum of 15 days


Bedside Visit
$1,500 per certificate period


Return of Minor Children
$50,000 per certificate period


Pet Return
$1,000 per certificate period


Political Evacuation
$10,000 lifetime maximum


Trip Interruption
$5,000 per certificate period


Lost Checked Luggage
$500 per certificate period


Travel Delay
Maximum $100/day after a 12-hour delay period requiring an unplanned overnight stay. Subject to a maximum of 2 days.


Emergency Dental (Acute Onset of Pain)
$250 per certificate period


Natural Disaster – Replacement Accommodations
Maximum $100/day for 5 days. Optional Personal Liability buy-up of $90,000 to Lifetime Maximum of $100,000. 


Hospital Indemnity
$100 per day of inpatient hospitalization


Personal Liability
$10,000 lifetime maximum



1Eligible expenses subject to deductible or coinsurance
2Eligible expenses NOT subject to deductible or coinsurance







Certain types of medical expenses are excluded from coverage under Atlas Travel insurance. Some exclusions are listed here. Refer to the Description of Coverage for the complete list of exclusions.

Pre-existing conditions — charges resulting directly or indirectly from any pre-existing condition are excluded from this insurance, except as covered under the Acute Onset of Pre-Existing Condition benefit for a sudden and unexpected outbreak or recurrence that is of short duration and requires urgent care, excluding chronic or congenital conditions. No coverage is available for known, scheduled, required, or expected medical care, drugs, or treatments existent or necessary prior to the effective date of coverage.
Routine medical examinations
Routine pre-natal care, pregnancy, child birth, and post-natal care
Medical expenses for injury or illness resulting from participation in specifically excluded extreme sports (see Description of Coverage for full list of excluded sports).﻿

Get a Quote
 
 


Get a Quote

 







                                                                    Does Atlas Travel provide any coverage while I am in my home country?
                                                                faq

 


Atlas Travel does offer medical expense coverage in your home country in the following situations:
Benefit Period
Atlas Travel will cover eligible medical expenses in the member’s home country for 90 days after the beginning of treatment so long as the related illness or injury began while the certificate was still in effect and treatment began while the member was outside their home country.
Incidental Home Country Coverage
For individuals with the U.S. as home country, for every three month period during which the Member is covered hereunder, medical expenses incurred in the U.S. are covered up to a maximum of 15 days.
For individuals with a home country other than the U.S., for every three month period during which the Member is covered hereunder, medical expenses incurred in the member’s home country are covered up to a maximum of 30 days. Any benefit accrued under a sin­gle 3 month period does not accumulate to another period. Failure of the member to continue his or her international trip or the members return to their home country for the sole purpose of obtaining treatment for an illness or injury that began while traveling shall void any home country coverage provided under the terms of this agreement.
 
 
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover me on trips of a year or longer?
                                                                faq

 


For non-U.S. citizens or residents whose travel does not include the U.S. or U.S. territories, the maximum coverage duration is 365 days. Additionally, coverage may be renewed up to 2 additional coverage periods. Coverage renewal requires satisfaction of a new deductible and coinsurance. Renewals may be filed through the Client Zone.
For all other travelers, the maximum duration is 364 days, and coverage is not renewable.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    How do I cancel my Atlas Travel coverage?
                                                                faq

 


You may submit a written cancellation request to Tokio Marine HCC – MIS Group prior to the effective date of coverage for a full refund. If Tokio Marine HCC – MIS Group receives the cancellation request following the effective date of coverage, only the unused portion of premium will be refunded. A $25 cancellation fee will apply. No refund will be issued for policies that have submitted claims.
 
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover multiple trips?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                No. Atlas Travel coverage is purchased for a duration you specify and applies to a single trip only. For coverage that applies to multiple trips, our Atlas MultiTrip™ product may work for you.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Are there any countries not covered in my Atlas Travel plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Yes. Certain countries under U.S. Government sanctions are not eligible for coverage. Additionally, certain travel restrictions declared by the U.S. State Department and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) effect benefits such as terrorism coverage, political evacuation, and coverage for communicable disease outbreaks. See Description of Coverage for restrictions and exclusions.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Who is eligible for an Atlas Travel insurance plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Anyone who is at least 14 days old and traveling internationally is eligible for coverage. . Policies must cover a minimum of five days; however, travel is not required for all five days. Applicants under age 70 may select an overall maximum limit ranging from $50,000 to $2,000,000. The overall maximum limit for members age 70 - 79 is $100,000, and the overall maximum limit for members over age 80 is $10,000 ($20,000 under Atlas Premium).
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    If I purchase an Atlas Travel Insurance plan, when does coverage become effective, and when does it end?
                                                                faq

 


Your Atlas Travel insurance coverage becomes effective on the latest of:

the moment we receive your application and correct premium (if application and payment is made online or by fax)
12:01am Eastern Time on the date we receive your application and payment (if application and payment are made by mail)
the moment you depart from your home country
12:01am Eastern Time on the date you request on your application

Your coverage will end on the earliest of:

11:59pm Eastern Time on the last day of the period for which you have paid a premium,
11:59pm Eastern Time on the date requested on your application,
the moment of your arrival upon return to your home country (unless you have started a benefit period or are eligible for home country coverage)

 
 
 




                                                                    Is Atlas Travel extendable?  
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Following the initial purchase, Atlas Travel coverage may be extended up to 364 days past the original effective date of coverage. Extension does not require satisfaction of a new deductible or coinsurance. File all extensions through the Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group Client Zone with payment by credit card.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover my dependents?  
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Yes.  You may purchase Atlas Travel coverage for your spouse and any number of additional dependents.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    What is covered under the Atlas Travel insurance plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                To see an overview of the benefits provided under Atlas Travel insurance coverage, please review our Atlas Travel Insurance Coverage page.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    How do I extend or renew my Atlas Travel insurance coverage?
                                                                faq

 


After your initial purchase, you may extend your coverage (5 day minimum) up to a maximum of 364 days from the initial effective date. Provided there is no break in coverage, you will not be required to re-satisfy the Deductible and Coinsurance nor will benefit limits be reset. If you are covered under Atlas International, after 364 days of continuous coverage you may renew your coverage for up to two additional coverage periods. Deductible and Coinsurance must be re-satisfied as of each renewal date. If a new application is required, then you must re-satisfy your Deductible, Coinsurance and Pre-existing Condition provisions.
Extensions or renewals must be made online in the Client Zone with payment by credit card.
 
 
 




                                                                    How do I extend my Atlas Travel insurance?
                                                                faq

 


Follow the below instructions to EXTEND your Atlas Travel medical insurance plan:

Go to the HCC Client Zone at: https://zone.hccmis.com/clientzone/
To login, you will need to enter your Certificate/ID number (ID #) and your password.  If you don’t know your password, click the “forgot password” button and enter your Certificate ID (ID #) and your date of birth.  Click “Login.”
Click “Extend Coverage.”
Enter the extension of coverage date. Click “Recalculate.” Click “Proceed to Payment Page.”
Enter payment information.  Click “Extend My Coverage.”
The email you enter in the payment information will receive coverage confirmation. 

 
 
 
 
 
 





A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z




ATop

Acts of Terrorism
                                                                                                                                    — an act, including but not limited to, the use of force or violence and/or the threat thereof, of any person or group(s) of persons, whether acting alone or on behalf of or in connection with any organization(s) or government(s) committed for political, religious, ideological or similar purposes including the intention to influence any government and/or to put the public, or any section of the public, in fear.
                                                                                                                            
Acute Onset of Pain (Emergency Dental)
                                                                                                                                    — a sudden and unexpected occurrence of pain which occurs spontaneously and without advance warning, either in the form of physician or dentist recommendation or symptoms, including pain, which would have caused a prudent person to seek medical or dental attention prior to onset of pain. Treatment must be obtained within 24 hours of the sudden and unexpected occurrence of pain.
                                                                                                                            

BTop

No terms found

CTop

No terms found

DTop

Displaced
                                                                                                                                    — required to depart a destination due to an evacuation ordered by prevailing authorities.
                                                                                                                            

ETop

Emergency Medical Evacuation
                                                                                                                                    — if recommended by your attending physician, who certifies that: evacuation is necessary to safeguard your life or limb, medically necessary treatment is not available locally, and if approved in advance and coordinated by Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group. If all circumstances are met, and the illness or injury is covered, certain plans will provide the following benefits: emergency air and/or ground transportation to the nearest hospital that is qualified to provide the medically necessary treatment.
                                                                                                                            
Emergency Reunion
                                                                                                                                    — an emergency reunion is the transportation of one relative (parent, spouse, sibling, or child aged 18 or older) to the hospital where a member is receiving inpatient care in the event of a covered emergency medical evacuation.
                                                                                                                            
Express Kidnapping
                                                                                                                                    — the actual or attempted abduction and holding of the member against his or her will, where personal belongings and/or readily available assets of the member are surrendered by the member in exchange for his or her release.
                                                                                                                            

FTop

No terms found

GTop

Guaranteed Issue
                                                                                                                                    — a type of insurance policy that is not medically underwritten.
                                                                                                                            

HTop

Home Country
                                                                                                                                    — Your Home Country is the country where you principally reside and receive regular mail. If you are a U.S. Citizen or resident, you are not eligible for coverage within the U.S except as provided under an eligible benefit period, regardless of the location of your principal residence.
                                                                                                                            

ITop

Insured Losses
                                                                                                                                    — covered losses and expenses consisting of the following: ransom, personal belongings, and/or crisis response fees and expenses.
                                                                                                                            

JTop

No terms found

KTop

Kidnapping
                                                                                                                                    — the actual, alleged, or attempted abduction and holding of the member against his or her will by a person or persons who demand a ransom specifically form the assets of the member in exchange for the member’s release.
                                                                                                                            

LTop

Lost Checked Luggage
                                                                                                                                    — lost checked luggage is a benefit that provides money for the replacement of clothes and personal hygiene items in the event your checked luggage is permanently lost by the transportation provider.
                                                                                                                            
Lost Luggage Assistance
                                                                                                                                    — tracking service to assist in locating luggage or other items lost in transit.
                                                                                                                            

MTop

No terms found

NTop

Natural Disaster
                                                                                                                                    — any event of force of nature caused by environmental factors that has catastrophic consequences. For the purpose of this insurance, natural disasters include: wildfire, earthquake, windborne dust or sand, volcanic eruption, tsunami, snow, rain or wind, that results in widespread and severe damage.
                                                                                                                            

OTop

No terms found

PTop

Personal Belongings
                                                                                                                                    — monies and/or property of monetary value that are: 

being carried or transported by the member when an express kidnapping or kidnapping first occurs; and
are surrendered during the course of an express kidnapping or kidnapping


Political Evacuation
                                                                                                                                    — political evacuation is a benefit offered under certain plans that assists in the coordination and associated costs of transportation to a safe country after a U.S. Government travel warning has been issued after arrival to the destination country.
                                                                                                                            
Pre-Destination Information
                                                                                                                                    — up-to-date information regarding the required vaccinations, health risks, travel restrictions, and weather conditions specific to your destination country.
                                                                                                                            

QTop

No terms found

RTop

Return of Minor Children
                                                                                                                                    — return of minor children is the assistance and financial coverage of transporting covered minor children to the terminal serving the area of principal residence when the only person age 18 or older traveling with them has been hospitalized for treatment of a covered Illness or Injury resulting in the children being left unattended for a period of time expected to exceed 36 hours.
                                                                                                                            
Repatriation of Remains
                                                                                                                                    — this is a benefit that covers expenses to return an insured’s remains (bodily or ashes) to their home country in the event of his or her death resulting from a covered Injury or Illness.
                                                                                                                            
Ransom
                                                                                                                                    — monies and/or other consideration of monetary value that are surrendered or to be surrendered by, or on behalf of, the member to meet an express kidnapping or kidnapping demand.
                                                                                                                            

STop

No terms found

TTop

Travel Document Replacement
                                                                                                                                    — assistance with obtaining replacement passports, birth certificates, visas, airline documents, and other travel-related documents.
                                                                                                                            
Travel Assistance Services
                                                                                                                                    — travel assistance services are complimentary services that focus on potential travel issues, which are available to every member that purchases an international insurance product from Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group. See the travel assistance services list for more details.
                                                                                                                            

UTop

No terms found

VTop

No terms found

WTop

No terms found

XTop

No terms found

YTop

No terms found

ZTop

No terms found








Quote
 
 


 
 
 


KHE2FFFYH6SP-152-789
Tokio Marine HCC - Medical Insurance Services Group (MIS Group) is a service company and a member of the Tokio Marine HCC group of companies. Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group has authority to enter into contracts of insurance on behalf of the Lloyd's underwriting members of Lloyd's Syndicate 4141, which is managed by Tokio Marine HCC – International Group.


















Quote Estimator




















YOUR PRODUCER


                                        Tokio Marine HCC - Medical Insurance Services Group
                                    

317-221-8089


sales@hccmis.com






Quote Estimator




 






Coverage Area




Worldwide, including U.S.
Worldwide, excluding U.S.







Travel Dates





Coverage Start Date





















Coverage End Date




















Travelers' Birthdates
























 Add Traveler
                                            






Eligibility Requirements



                                                Get Quote Now
                                            




 





Atlas Travel® InsuranceFor international travel, Atlas insurance provides customizable coverage for travelers looking to cover specific needs while abroad.Perfect For:Travelers wanting to build a custom planCoverage balance between the essentials and more specific needsWhy do I need travel medical insurance?International travel can represent financial risk. The benefits of many standard medical insurance policies do not apply beyond the borders of your home country. An Atlas medical insurance plan can be the difference between a trip ruined by unexpected illness or injury, versus a trip with access to quality care and financial help if the unexpected strikes. 











Please wait while we process your request.









































    Atlas Premium Insurance | HCC Medical Insurance Services































800-605-2282 Sign In | 



—
















Atlas Premium Insurance
For the travel elite, Atlas Premium travel insurance provides exceptional, quality coverage as you travel abroad.
Perfect For:

Parents interested in premium family coverage for their children and themselves
Tourists, adventure travelers, and vacationers interested in emergency medical benefits and supplemental travel-assistance benefits in the highest possible coverage amounts
The business and travel elite seeking additional peace of mind


Why do I need travel medical insurance?
International travel can represent financial risk. The benefits of many standard medical insurance policies do not apply beyond the borders of your home country. A travel medical insurance plan can be the difference between a trip ruined by unexpected illness or injury, versus a trip with access to quality care and financial help if the unexpected strikes. Compare Atlas Travel medical insurance plans.














Quote
 
 


Benefits
Exclusions
Claim
FAQs
Glossary
Quote









Benefits1
Details


Deductibles
$0, $100, $250, $500, $1,000 or $2,500 per certificate period


Maximum Coverage per Injury or Illness
Age 70 to 79: $50,000 or $100,000

Age 80 or older: $20,000
All others: $50,000, $100,000, $200,000, $500,000, $1,000,000, or $2,000,000


Maximum Coverage per Certificate Period
(Excludes Emergency Medical Evacuation, Accidental Death & Dismemberment, Common Carrier Accidental Death, Personal Liability and Crisis Response)
Age 70 to 79: $50,000 or $100,000

Age 80 or older: $20,000

All others: $50,000, $100,000, $200,000, $500,000, $1,000,000, or $2,000,000


Coinsurance – Claims Incurred in U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 90% of next $5,000 of eligible expenses after the deductible, then 100% to maximum coverage limit. Coinsurance will be waived if expenses are incurred within the Preferred Provider Organization (PPO).


Coinsurance – Claims Incurred Outside U.S. or Canada
For the certificate period, underwriters will pay 100% of eligible expenses after the deductible up to the maximum coverage limit


Hospital Room and Board
Average semi-private room rate, including nursing services


Local Ambulance
Usual, reasonable, and customary charges when covered illness or injury results in hospitalization as inpatient


Emergency Room Co-Payment—Claims incurred in U.S. or Canada
Member is responsible for $200 co-payment for each use of the emergency room for an illness, unless admitted to the hospital. No co-payment for emergency room treatment of an injury.


Intensive Care Unit
Usual, reasonable, and customary charges


Physical Therapy and Chiropractic Care
$50 maximum per day. Must be ordered in advance by a physician.


Urgent Care Center—Claims incurred in U.S. or Canada
(Not subject to deductible)
Member responsible for $50 co-payment/visit, after which coinsurance will apply.


Terrorism
$50,000 maximum lifetime limit, eligible medical expenses only


All Other Eligible Medical Expenses
Usual, reasonable, and customary charges






Benefits2
Details



Accidental Death and Dismemberment (AD&D)
Excludes loss due to common carrier accident $100,000 maximum benefit for any one family or group  Members under age 18: Lifetime maximum: $5,000 Death: $5,000 Loss of 2 limbs: $5,000 Loss of 1 limb: $2,500  Members age 18—69: Lifetime maximum: $100,000 Death: $100,000 Loss of 2 limbs: $100,000 Loss of 1 limb: $50,000
Members age 70—74: Lifetime maximum: $12,500 Death: $12,500 Loss of 2 limbs: $12,500 Loss of 1 limb: $6,250  Members age 75 and older: Lifetime maximum: $6,250 Death: $6,250 Loss of 2 limbs: $6,250 Loss of 1 limb: $3,125


Emergency Medical Evacuation
$1,000,000 lifetime maximum


Repatriation of Remains
Overall maximum limit


Local Burial or Cremation
$5,000 lifetime maximum


Common Carrier Accidental Death
(Per member; subject to a maximum of $250,000 any one family or group)

Members under age 18: $25,000
Members age 18—69: $50,000
Members age 70—74: $12,500
Members age 75 and older: $6,250


Emergency Reunion
$50,000 per certificate period, subject to a maximum of 15 days


Crisis Response—Ransom, Personal Belongings, and Crisis Response Fees and Expenses
$100,000 maximum per certificate period


Bedside Visit
$1,500 per certificate period


Return of Minor Children
$50,000 per certificate period


Pet Return
$1,000 per certificate period


Political Evacuation
$25,000 lifetime maximum


Trip Interruption
$10,000 per certificate period


Lost Checked Luggage
$1,000 per certificate period


Travel Delay
Maximum $200/day after a 12-hour delay period requiring an unplanned overnight stay. Subject to a maximum of 2 days.


Emergency Dental (acute onset of pain)
$250 per certificate period


Natural Disaster – Replacement Accommodations
Maximum $250/day for 5 days


Hospital Indemnity
$100 per day of inpatient hospitalization


Personal Liability
$100,000 lifetime maximum



1Eligible expenses subject to deductible or coinsurance
2Eligible expenses NOT subject to deductible or coinsurance







Certain types of medical expenses are excluded from coverage under Atlas Travel insurance. Some exclusions are listed here. Refer to the Description of Coverage for the complete list of exclusions.

Pre-existing conditions — charges resulting directly or indirectly from any pre-existing condition are excluded from this insurance, except as covered under the Acute Onset of Pre-Existing Condition benefit for a sudden and unexpected outbreak or recurrence that is of short duration and requires urgent care, excluding chronic or congenital conditions. No coverage is available for known, scheduled, required, or expected medical care, drugs, or treatments existent or necessary prior to the effective date of coverage.
Routine medical examinations
Routine pre-natal care, pregnancy, child birth, and post-natal care
Medical expenses for injury or illness resulting from participation in specifically-excluded extreme sports (see Description of Coverage for full list of excluded sports).﻿

 
 




 







                                                                    Does Atlas Travel provide any coverage while I am in my home country?
                                                                faq

 


Atlas Travel does offer medical expense coverage in your home country in the following situations:
Benefit Period
Atlas Travel will cover eligible medical expenses in the member’s home country for 90 days after the beginning of treatment so long as the related illness or injury began while the certificate was still in effect and treatment began while the member was outside their home country.
Incidental Home Country Coverage
For individuals with the U.S. as home country, for every three month period during which the Member is covered hereunder, medical expenses incurred in the U.S. are covered up to a maximum of 15 days.
For individuals with a home country other than the U.S., for every three month period during which the Member is covered hereunder, medical expenses incurred in the member’s home country are covered up to a maximum of 30 days. Any benefit accrued under a sin­gle 3 month period does not accumulate to another period. Failure of the member to continue his or her international trip or the members return to their home country for the sole purpose of obtaining treatment for an illness or injury that began while traveling shall void any home country coverage provided under the terms of this agreement.
 
 
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover me on trips of a year or longer?
                                                                faq

 


For non-U.S. citizens or residents whose travel does not include the U.S. or U.S. territories, the maximum coverage duration is 365 days. Additionally, coverage may be renewed up to 2 additional coverage periods. Coverage renewal requires satisfaction of a new deductible and coinsurance. Renewals may be filed through the Client Zone.
For all other travelers, the maximum duration is 364 days, and coverage is not renewable.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    How do I cancel my Atlas Travel coverage?
                                                                faq

 


You may submit a written cancellation request to Tokio Marine HCC – MIS Group prior to the effective date of coverage for a full refund. If Tokio Marine HCC – MIS Group receives the cancellation request following the effective date of coverage, only the unused portion of premium will be refunded. A $25 cancellation fee will apply. No refund will be issued for policies that have submitted claims.
 
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover multiple trips?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                No. Atlas Travel coverage is purchased for a duration you specify and applies to a single trip only. For coverage that applies to multiple trips, our Atlas MultiTrip™ product may work for you.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Are there any countries not covered in my Atlas Travel plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Yes. Certain countries under U.S. Government sanctions are not eligible for coverage. Additionally, certain travel restrictions declared by the U.S. State Department and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) effect benefits such as terrorism coverage, political evacuation, and coverage for communicable disease outbreaks. See Description of Coverage for restrictions and exclusions.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Who is eligible for an Atlas Travel insurance plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Anyone who is at least 14 days old and traveling internationally is eligible for coverage. . Policies must cover a minimum of five days; however, travel is not required for all five days. Applicants under age 70 may select an overall maximum limit ranging from $50,000 to $2,000,000. The overall maximum limit for members age 70 - 79 is $100,000, and the overall maximum limit for members over age 80 is $10,000 ($20,000 under Atlas Premium).
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    If I purchase an Atlas Travel Insurance plan, when does coverage become effective, and when does it end?
                                                                faq

 


Your Atlas Travel insurance coverage becomes effective on the latest of:

the moment we receive your application and correct premium (if application and payment is made online or by fax)
12:01am Eastern Time on the date we receive your application and payment (if application and payment are made by mail)
the moment you depart from your home country
12:01am Eastern Time on the date you request on your application

Your coverage will end on the earliest of:

11:59pm Eastern Time on the last day of the period for which you have paid a premium,
11:59pm Eastern Time on the date requested on your application,
the moment of your arrival upon return to your home country (unless you have started a benefit period or are eligible for home country coverage)

 
 
 




                                                                    Is Atlas Travel extendable?  
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Following the initial purchase, Atlas Travel coverage may be extended up to 364 days past the original effective date of coverage. Extension does not require satisfaction of a new deductible or coinsurance. File all extensions through the Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group Client Zone with payment by credit card.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    Will Atlas Travel cover my dependents?  
                                                                faq

 


                                                                Yes.  You may purchase Atlas Travel coverage for your spouse and any number of additional dependents.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    What is covered under the Atlas Travel insurance plan?
                                                                faq

 


                                                                To see an overview of the benefits provided under Atlas Travel insurance coverage, please review our Atlas Travel Insurance Coverage page.
                                                             
 
 




                                                                    How do I extend or renew my Atlas Travel insurance coverage?
                                                                faq

 


After your initial purchase, you may extend your coverage (5 day minimum) up to a maximum of 364 days from the initial effective date. Provided there is no break in coverage, you will not be required to re-satisfy the Deductible and Coinsurance nor will benefit limits be reset. If you are covered under Atlas International, after 364 days of continuous coverage you may renew your coverage for up to two additional coverage periods. Deductible and Coinsurance must be re-satisfied as of each renewal date. If a new application is required, then you must re-satisfy your Deductible, Coinsurance and Pre-existing Condition provisions.
Extensions or renewals must be made online in the Client Zone with payment by credit card.
 
 
 




                                                                    How do I extend my Atlas Travel insurance?
                                                                faq

 


Follow the below instructions to EXTEND your Atlas Travel medical insurance plan:

Go to the HCC Client Zone at: https://zone.hccmis.com/clientzone/
To login, you will need to enter your Certificate/ID number (ID #) and your password.  If you don’t know your password, click the “forgot password” button and enter your Certificate ID (ID #) and your date of birth.  Click “Login.”
Click “Extend Coverage.”
Enter the extension of coverage date. Click “Recalculate.” Click “Proceed to Payment Page.”
Enter payment information.  Click “Extend My Coverage.”
The email you enter in the payment information will receive coverage confirmation. 

 
 
 
 
 
 





A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z




ATop

Acts of Terrorism
                                                                                                                                    — an act, including but not limited to, the use of force or violence and/or the threat thereof, of any person or group(s) of persons, whether acting alone or on behalf of or in connection with any organization(s) or government(s) committed for political, religious, ideological or similar purposes including the intention to influence any government and/or to put the public, or any section of the public, in fear.
                                                                                                                            
Acute Onset of Pain (Emergency Dental)
                                                                                                                                    — a sudden and unexpected occurrence of pain which occurs spontaneously and without advance warning, either in the form of physician or dentist recommendation or symptoms, including pain, which would have caused a prudent person to seek medical or dental attention prior to onset of pain. Treatment must be obtained within 24 hours of the sudden and unexpected occurrence of pain.
                                                                                                                            

BTop

No terms found

CTop

No terms found

DTop

Displaced
                                                                                                                                    — required to depart a destination due to an evacuation ordered by prevailing authorities.
                                                                                                                            

ETop

Emergency Medical Evacuation
                                                                                                                                    — if recommended by your attending physician, who certifies that: evacuation is necessary to safeguard your life or limb, medically necessary treatment is not available locally, and if approved in advance and coordinated by Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group. If all circumstances are met, and the illness or injury is covered, certain plans will provide the following benefits: emergency air and/or ground transportation to the nearest hospital that is qualified to provide the medically necessary treatment.
                                                                                                                            
Emergency Reunion
                                                                                                                                    — an emergency reunion is the transportation of one relative (parent, spouse, sibling, or child aged 18 or older) to the hospital where a member is receiving inpatient care in the event of a covered emergency medical evacuation.
                                                                                                                            
Express Kidnapping
                                                                                                                                    — the actual or attempted abduction and holding of the member against his or her will, where personal belongings and/or readily available assets of the member are surrendered by the member in exchange for his or her release.
                                                                                                                            

FTop

No terms found

GTop

Guaranteed Issue
                                                                                                                                    — a type of insurance policy that is not medically underwritten.
                                                                                                                            

HTop

Home Country
                                                                                                                                    — Your Home Country is the country where you principally reside and receive regular mail. If you are a U.S. Citizen or resident, you are not eligible for coverage within the U.S except as provided under an eligible benefit period, regardless of the location of your principal residence.
                                                                                                                            

ITop

Insured Losses
                                                                                                                                    — covered losses and expenses consisting of the following: ransom, personal belongings, and/or crisis response fees and expenses.
                                                                                                                            

JTop

No terms found

KTop

Kidnapping
                                                                                                                                    — the actual, alleged, or attempted abduction and holding of the member against his or her will by a person or persons who demand a ransom specifically form the assets of the member in exchange for the member’s release.
                                                                                                                            

LTop

Lost Checked Luggage
                                                                                                                                    — lost checked luggage is a benefit that provides money for the replacement of clothes and personal hygiene items in the event your checked luggage is permanently lost by the transportation provider.
                                                                                                                            
Lost Luggage Assistance
                                                                                                                                    — tracking service to assist in locating luggage or other items lost in transit.
                                                                                                                            

MTop

No terms found

NTop

Natural Disaster
                                                                                                                                    — any event of force of nature caused by environmental factors that has catastrophic consequences. For the purpose of this insurance, natural disasters include: wildfire, earthquake, windborne dust or sand, volcanic eruption, tsunami, snow, rain or wind, that results in widespread and severe damage.
                                                                                                                            

OTop

No terms found

PTop

Personal Belongings
                                                                                                                                    — monies and/or property of monetary value that are: 

being carried or transported by the member when an express kidnapping or kidnapping first occurs; and
are surrendered during the course of an express kidnapping or kidnapping


Political Evacuation
                                                                                                                                    — political evacuation is a benefit offered under certain plans that assists in the coordination and associated costs of transportation to a safe country after a U.S. Government travel warning has been issued after arrival to the destination country.
                                                                                                                            
Pre-Destination Information
                                                                                                                                    — up-to-date information regarding the required vaccinations, health risks, travel restrictions, and weather conditions specific to your destination country.
                                                                                                                            

QTop

No terms found

RTop

Return of Minor Children
                                                                                                                                    — return of minor children is the assistance and financial coverage of transporting covered minor children to the terminal serving the area of principal residence when the only person age 18 or older traveling with them has been hospitalized for treatment of a covered Illness or Injury resulting in the children being left unattended for a period of time expected to exceed 36 hours.
                                                                                                                            
Repatriation of Remains
                                                                                                                                    — this is a benefit that covers expenses to return an insured’s remains (bodily or ashes) to their home country in the event of his or her death resulting from a covered Injury or Illness.
                                                                                                                            
Ransom
                                                                                                                                    — monies and/or other consideration of monetary value that are surrendered or to be surrendered by, or on behalf of, the member to meet an express kidnapping or kidnapping demand.
                                                                                                                            

STop

No terms found

TTop

Travel Document Replacement
                                                                                                                                    — assistance with obtaining replacement passports, birth certificates, visas, airline documents, and other travel-related documents.
                                                                                                                            
Travel Assistance Services
                                                                                                                                    — travel assistance services are complimentary services that focus on potential travel issues, which are available to every member that purchases an international insurance product from Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group. See the travel assistance services list for more details.
                                                                                                                            

UTop

No terms found

VTop

No terms found

WTop

No terms found

XTop

No terms found

YTop

No terms found

ZTop

No terms found








Quote
 
 


 
 
 


KHE2FFFYH6SP-152-791
Tokio Marine HCC - Medical Insurance Services Group (MIS Group) is a service company and a member of the Tokio Marine HCC group of companies. Tokio Marine HCC - MIS Group has authority to enter into contracts of insurance on behalf of the Lloyd's underwriting members of Lloyd's Syndicate 4141, which is managed by Tokio Marine HCC – International Group.
















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          









	Search | ACR Security & Electronics



































 Visit Our Philadelphia Location 


Welcome: Guest     

 Login | Register


  0 Items     $0.00View


















 Need Help? Call Us Today 
866.462.9379








0
              
              
              
              
              
              
              
              
              
              
              


Apartment Multi-Tenant IntercomIntercom SystemsDoor Strikes-Access ControlCCTV KitsCCTV/SurveillanceCasesMounting SolutionsWire & CableWiring AccessoriesConnectorsCommercial/Residential Sound ProductsPortable Sound SystemsPower ProductsTest EquipmentElectronic PartsElectronic RepairNetworking/Datacom2-Way RadiosHome Theatre/HDTVLead-Acid BatteriesElectronic Tool KitsAll Products


















Specials
Services
About Us
Contact Us
















										Select ...
									
										ACR Security
									
										Aiphone
									
										Aiphone Cable
									
										Alpha Communications
									
										Altronix
									
										AmpliVox
									
										Anchor Audio
									
										Apogee Sound
									
										Atlas Sound
									
										BES Manufacturing
									
										BNC
									
										Bogen
									
										Bosch
									
										Byte Brothers
									
										Category 5e
									
										CLC Products
									
										Coast
									
										Comelit
									
										Conquest Audio
									
										Crest CCTV
									
										Eclipse Tools
									
										Electro Voice
									
										EV Electrovoice
									
										Eveready
									
										EverFocus
									
										Galaxy Audio
									
										Intercom
									
										Kenwood
									
										Marshall Electronics
									
										Master Appliance
									
										Motorola
									
										Neutrik
									
										NTE
									
										NTE Relay
									
										PanaVise
									
										Paso Sound
									
										Peerless
									
										Pelican Products
									
										Platinum Tools
									
										Platt
									
										PowerStar
									
										Quam
									
										RCI Rutherford Controls
									
										Rolls
									
										Samsung Security CCTV
									
										Shure
									
										Siamese Cable
									
										Speco
									
										SR Components
									
										Switchcraft
									
										Tripp-Lite
									
										Vanco
									
										Vitek CCTV
									
										VMP
									
										Weller
									
										Wire & Cable
									















Apartment Multi-Tenant IntercomIntercom SystemsDoor Strikes-Access ControlCCTV KitsCCTV/SurveillanceCasesMounting SolutionsWire & CableWiring AccessoriesConnectorsCommercial/Residential Sound ProductsPortable Sound SystemsPower ProductsTest EquipmentElectronic PartsElectronic RepairNetworking/Datacom2-Way RadiosHome Theatre/HDTVLead-Acid BatteriesElectronic Tool KitsAll Products










Less Than $100$100 to $499$500 to $999


























Home > Search

Search Results


						You searched for all products made by Atlas Sound







							Narrow by Category
						
All Products (1,361)Commercial/Residential Sound Products (830)




							Narrow by Manufacturer
						
Atlas Sound (remove)




							Narrow by Price
						
Below $25 (292)$25 to $50 (217)$50 to $100 (224)$100 to $200 (199)$200 to $500 (185)(expand)

$500 to $1,000 (136)$1,000 to $2,000 (57)$2,000 to $5,000 (42)$5,000 to $10,000 (9)






Show: 

								20
							
								40
							
								80
							
								120
							
								200
							

Sort: 

								Default
							
								Price Low to High
							
								Price High to Low
							
								Name (A-Z)
							
								Name (Z-A)
							
								Rating Low to High
							
								Rating High to Low
							
								Newest
							





Page 1 of 69
Page 12345...69














Atlas Sound 135-18 100 Series 18.5" Deep Welded Cabinet (UL Listed) 35RU

Your Price $530.92
MSRP $608.99



More Info














Atlas Sound 121-18 100 Series 18.5" Deep Welded Cabinet (UL Listed) 21RU

Your Price $378.43
MSRP $433.99



More Info














Atlas Sound 12CXT60 Coax Compression Driver 12" 2-Way 70.7V Speaker

Your Price $333.91
MSRP $382.99



More Info

 












Atlas Sound 140-18 100 Series 18.5" Deep Welded Cabinet (UL Listed) 40RU

Your Price $565.33
MSRP $647.99



More Info
















Atlas Sound 124-18 100 Series 18.5" Deep Welded Cabinet (UL Listed) 24RU

Your Price $397.50
MSRP $455.99



More Info














Atlas Sound 12TO8PLATE 12" enclosures to 8" speaker adapter Ring

Your Price $23.57
MSRP $26.99



More Info

 












Atlas Sound 144-18 100 Series 18.5" Deep Welded Cabinet (UL Listed) 44RU

Your Price $598.38
MSRP $685.99



More Info














Atlas Sound 161-4 Contemporary Wall or Ceiling Baffle 4"

Your Price $23.57
MSRP $26.99



More Info

 














Atlas Sound 161RES Recessed Stainless Steel Enclosure for VP161

Your Price $93.52
MSRP $107.99



More Info

 












Atlas Sound 161-8 Contemporary Wall or Ceiling Baffle 8"

Your Price $26.06
MSRP $29.99



More Info

 












Atlas Sound 164-12A-052 Deluxe Steel Baffle 12" - Black

Your Price $55.36
MSRP $63.99



More Info

 












Atlas Sound 161SES Surface Stainless Steel Enclosure for VP161

Your Price $98.50
MSRP $112.99



More Info

 














Atlas Sound 164-12A Deluxe Steel Baffle 12"

Your Price $47.63
MSRP $54.99



More Info

 












Atlas Sound 164-8A-052 Deluxe Steel Baffle 8" - Black

Your Price $42.64
MSRP $48.99



More Info

 












Atlas Sound 164-15A Deluxe Steel Baffle 15"

Your Price $88.40
MSRP $101.99



More Info

 












Atlas Sound 169-8 Economical Wall or Ceiling Baffle 8"

Your Price $9.48
MSRP $10.99



More Info

 














Atlas Sound 170-8A Perforated Baffle 8"

Your Price $34.91
MSRP $39.99



More Info

 












Atlas Sound 164-8A Deluxe Steel Baffle 8"

Your Price $36.28
MSRP $41.99



More Info

 












Atlas Sound 191-78-8 Extra Deep Enclosure with Adjustable Mounting Bracket

Your Price $31.17
MSRP $35.99



More Info

 












Atlas Sound 186-24 Channel Supports with Adjustable Slot & Flat Nut

Your Price $9.60
MSRP $10.99



More Info

 







Page 1 of 69
Page 12345...69










Educational & Government Accounts
 

ACR Security & Electronics accepts purchase orders from all education and government institutions. Please contact our Customer Service team for more information at 1-866-462-9379.
Gov't CAGE Code: 4A844





Join Our Mailing List
Join today and be the first to receive all the latest news, event updates and promotional offers from our store.








Email Address:








Your privacy is respected

Get Social


Like Us

Follow Us

Add Us


Explore

Home
Contact Us
About Us
Register
Services
Shopping Cart
Policies
Sitemap









We Ship Anywhere 
             
Tax Free Shopping - Excludes PA




1539 West Passyunk Avenue, Philadelphia, PA 19145
© 2017 ACR Security & Electronics | A.C. Radio Supply Inc.
Website Designed & Developed by AG Marketing Solutions









Top















Ask.com - What's Your Question?
















Ask.com



















            
Answers



|

Videos














Atlas America






Web Results



Atlas America Insurance, Visitor Medical Insurance for USA Visitors ...

www.atlasamericainsurance.net
Atlas America Insurance is a visitor medical insurance for USA visitors and 
travelers outside America, relatives or parents visiting USA need visitors 
insurance ...



Atlas America Insurance - Best Visitors insurance for foreign ...

www.insubuy.com/atlasamerica-insurance
Atlas America insurance is a comprehensive visitors insurance for foreign 
nationals visiting the U.S.. Many people whose parents, in-laws or other relatives 
are ...










Source




Maps of the United States



Country Maps:

Physical & Political
             ·                     Historical
             ·                     Topographical
             ·                     Printable
             ·                     Interstate Highways
             ·                     Blank
 

State Maps:

The 50 States
             ·                     County Boundaries
             ·                     Territories
 
 




More Results »



What is Atlas America?





Atlas America

www.atlasamericainsurance.com
Atlas America is a comprehensive visitors health insurance for all non-US 
citizens traveling outside their home country and if their travel includes USA.



How does the Atlas America Insurance Work? - VisitorsCoverage

www.visitorscoverage.com/atlas-america-insurance/how-it-works
Atlas America Visitor Insurance in USA: How does atlas America insurance works
, coverage and benefits.



Atlas America Insurance - VisitorsCoverage

www.visitorscoverage.com/atlas-america-insurance
Atlas America insurance is a visitor insurance plan that provides medical 
coverage and emergency services to Non-US citizens travelling outside their 
home ...




More Results »



When did Charles Atlas come to America?





Charles Atlas - Athlete - Biography.com

www.biography.com/people/charles-atlas-9191659
Apr 2, 2014 ... Italian-American bodybuilder Charles Atlas founded a highly successful mail-
order business from his patented "Dynamic-Tension" exercise ...



Charles Atlas - Wikipedia

en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Charles_Atlas
Charles Atlas was an Italian-American bodybuilder best remembered as the 
developer of a ... Nowhere did Atlas win a title proclaiming him to be the world's 
most perfectly developed man. .... When the narrator comes across the term "
Dynamic Tension" in a book about the mysterious cult leader Bokonon, he laughs 
because ...



Charles Atlas - Immigration to the United States

immigrationtounitedstates.org/367-charles-atlas.html
Identification: Italian American physical fitness expert ... Charles Atlas was born 
Angelo Siciliano to farmers in the Calabria region of southern Italy. After his ...




More Results »



Atlas America







1


2


3


4


5


Next










Related Search



                                United States Atlas




                                Online Atlas




                                World Atlas




Atlas Vs America




                                Greek God Atlas




                                United States Atlas for Kids




Atlas Holding the World




Atlas Lathe Parts for Sale




                                Consol Energy




                                Allegheny Energy




                                Cabelas




                                Equitable Resources



















About


Privacy


Terms


Careers


Help


Feedback


Sitemap


© 2017 IAC Publishing, LLC




















	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads







































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































